Copyright


KUMO KAGYU

Translation by Kevin Steinbach Cover art by Noboru Kannatuki

This book is a work of fiction. Names, characters, places, and incidents are the product of the author’s imagination or are used fictitiously. Any resemblance to actual events, locales, or persons, living or dead, is coincidental.

GOBLIN SLAYER vol. 4

Copyright © 2017 Kumo Kagyu

Illustrations copyright © 2017 Noboru Kannatuki

All rights reserved.

Original Japanese edition published in 2017 by SB Creative Corp.

This English edition is published by arrangement with SB Creative Corp., Tokyo, in care of Tuttle-Mori Agency, Inc., Tokyo.

English translation © 2017 by Yen Press, LLC

Yen Press, LLC supports the right to free expression and the value of copyright. The purpose of copyright is to encourage writers and artists to produce the creative works that enrich our culture.

The scanning, uploading, and distribution of this book without permission is a theft of the author’s intellectual property. If you would like permission to use material from the book (other than for review purposes), please contact the publisher. Thank you for your support of the author’s rights.

Yen On

1290 Avenue of the Americas

New York, NY 10104

Visit us at yenpress.com

facebook.com/yenpress

twitter.com/yenpress

yenpress.tumblr.com

instagram.com/yenpress

First Yen On Edition: December 2017

Yen On is an imprint of Yen Press, LLC.

The Yen On name and logo are trademarks of Yen Press, LLC.

The publisher is not responsible for websites (or their content) that are not owned by the publisher.

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data

Names: Kagyū, Kumo, author. | Kannatuki, Noboru, illustrator.

Title: Goblin slayer / Kumo Kagyu ; illustration by Noboru Kannatuki.

Other titles: Goburin sureiyā. English

Description: New York, NY : Yen On, 2016–

Identifiers: LCCN 2016033529 | ISBN 9780316501590 (v. 1 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316553223 (v. 2 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316553230 (v. 3 : pbk.) | ISBN 9780316411882 (v. 4 : pbk.)

Subjects: LCSH: Goblins—Fiction. | GSAFD: Fantasy fiction.

Classification: LCC PL872.5.A367 G6313 2016 | DDC 895.63/6—dc23

LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2016033529

ISBNs: 978-0-316-41188-2 (paperback)

978-0-316-44824-6 (ebook)

E3-20171114-JV-PC





Contents


Cover

Insert

Title Page

Copyright

Chapter 1: Of Rookie Warrior and Apprentice Priestess

Chapter 2: Of a Certain Little Boy

Chapter 3: Of the Tavern Waitress

Chapter 4: Of a Perfectly Ordinary Goblin Nest

Chapter 5: Of a Day When He Isn’t There

Chapter 6: Of the Destruction of the Demon-Enthralled Temple of Doom

Chapter 7: Of the Second Time the Necromancer’s Plans Were Upset

Chapter 8: Of an Elf’s Lazy Day

Chapter 9: Of the Three of Them, Some Months Ago

Chapter 10: Of Going There and Back Again

Afterword

Yen Newsletter





A shining star: the promise of a hundred suns in the heavens.

A colored thread: one stitch in a finished cloth.

A drop of rain: one fleck of a surging sea.

An adventurer’s scar: one story in a hero’s legend.

A thousand thousands; ten thousand ten thousands: together they rise higher than the mountains.

Thus the world is made, regardless of how the dice may fall.





The cheap blade cut through the miasma with a fwwsh, and a giant rat, fat and round, came flying at them.

“Eeyikes!”

Its wide, dirty front teeth were sharp, its malodorous breath summoning images of their untimely demise.

Overwhelmed, he stumbled backward, batting at the creature with his well-used round shield.

“GYURI?!”

The rat fell to the ground with a cry, but it quickly scrambled up again. No damage.

Rookie Warrior shook out his left arm, which had gone numb from the impact despite the shield, and tried to regain his footing.

“Come on, why didn’t you hit it back?”

“My whole arm hurts!”

Behind him, Apprentice Priestess admonished him in her strident, nasal voice. She held a combined sword-and-scales in one hand and a lantern in the other while frowning deeply.

The sewers reeked with a rotten stench that threatened to turn his stomach. Even keeping his nose blocked didn’t help.

The slick footing. Wastewater flowing nearby. Giant rats with a bite that threatened much worse than simple pain. The vermin that writhed everywhere.

All of this was no different from normal. But it still put Rookie Warrior on the verge of tears.

One day down here, one gold coin in your pocket, they say.

That was if you met your quota. And that was an important source of income for making a living.

Still, shouldn’t adventurers at least be dealing with goblins or something…?

“Watch out, dummy, here it comes!”

“—?!”

His friend’s shout brought his attention back, and he heaved a great thrust with his sword, not even looking where he aimed.

“GYAARU?!?!”

He pierced fur and flesh and sinewy heart. The sensation was unpleasant.

It was accompanied by a gush of warm liquid that spattered across the boy’s face.

He leaned against the thrashing hunk of meat and cried out.

“H-hrkk…?!”

When he shoved the rat off his sword, it fell, still twitching, to the ground.

The black pool of blood at his feet seeped across the ground, soaking his boots.

“Hey, are you all right? It didn’t bite you?”

“Y-yeah, I’m fine.”

“…………Okay.”

Apprentice Priestess put on her best show of nonchalance, but even so, she hurried to Rookie Warrior’s side. Heedless of her white robes, she wiped at the blood on his cheek, and some smeared her fingers.

“It didn’t get in your eyes, did it? What about your mouth?”

“Ugh. A little.”

“What were you doing? Gosh.”

With an exasperated mutter, she took an antidote out of the bag of items she was carrying.

Rookie Warrior was spitting out blood and washing his mouth with the canteen. He downed the bitter antidote gratefully.

Both of them were still Porcelain rank. For them, the Cure miracle, for healing poison, was as much a dream as full plate armor or a suit of mail.

Still, they could not be underestimated—as the former monster, now an inert lump on the floor, could attest.

The rat had been busy with something: a corpse clad in rags. The figure’s empty eye sockets and ruined cheekbones suggested a vagrant, but around its gnawed-out throat hung a level tag.

Apprentice Priestess took the porcelain-colored tag, wrapped it gently in a handkerchief, and put it in her bag.

The unfortunate girl—they knew she was a girl, for the tag identified her as such—had not been wearing any armor. She had gone down into the sewers with nothing but her clothes and a stick, and the rats, most likely, had eaten her.

“…Ugh,” Rookie Warrior said. “They’re back.”

“Don’t sound so unhappy. This is our job, isn’t it?”

Perhaps it was the death of its kin that drew it, or simply the smell of spilt blood, but another rat had appeared from the sewer depths.

The creature was bigger than an infant child, its shadow wavering in the lantern light.

“We need the ear to prove we killed it,” said Apprentice Priestess. “Quick, cut it off before it gets chewed on!”

“The ear? Me?”

“Just do it!”

“You could act just a little more concerned for me, you know…”

Even as he muttered, the boy grabbed the hilt of his sword, still stuck in the rat’s carcass, and gave it a tug.

“…Huh?”

It wouldn’t come out.

No matter how hard he pulled, the sword, lodged firmly in the meat, refused to budge.

He braced himself for leverage against the corpse—now weirdly soft after its violent passing—but to no avail.

And as he stood there struggling, one of the live rats, its eyes burning brightly, was drawing ever nearer.

“N-no—!” he gasped. “H-hold on a minute…!”

“Here it comes! Do something, dummy, it’s getting closer!”

“E-eeyikes!”

It was the work of an instant:

Rookie Warrior tumbled backward to avoid the rat’s jaws, landing in a pile of waste. The rotten food, or whatever it was, slopped over him, but it was better than being bitten and risking an infection. A critical hit from those teeth and his throat could be torn out altogether.

“GURUUURRRU…!”

The giant rat growled, whipping its tail back and forth, menacing Rookie Warrior. It probably saw the unarmed boy and the little girl studiously hanging back behind him as simply more food. It looked at them as a bit of saliva dribbled from its mouth, the very image of hunger. It obviously had no intention of letting them get away.

Of course, if they ran, the adventurers would not get to eat, either—albeit for more indirect reasons.

“Ahhh, darn it all!” Apprentice Priestess gave an unmannerly click of her tongue.

Giant rats…Giant rats spread illness and are dirty and one is attacking us right now, and they are enemies of Order—enemies of Order!

She seemed to be trying to remind herself of all this as she lifted the sword-and-scales high and as light began to build around it. It grew into a sword of lightning.

“Lord of judgment, sword-prince, scale-bearer, display here your power!”

And then Holy Smite, which she had called forth from the gods, pierced the rat with its blade.

Emitting a wisp of smoke and the smell of burning flesh, the giant rat soared through the air before bouncing and rolling over, dead.

The boy pursed his lips with a sound of displeasure as the girl let out a relieved breath.

“Lucky you. The gods make everything nice and easy, don’t they?”

“Oh, save it. You know I can only call on them once per day.” Apprentice Priestess glared at Rookie Warrior for his show of disrespect. “Anyway, hurry up and get your sword. I want to collect those ears and then go home and take a long bath.”

“Yeah, sure.”

Rookie Warrior approached the body of the first rat hesitantly, and this time put his whole strength into extracting his sword.

Then…

Scrrrape.

“…”

“…”

It was a sound they did not like. The two adventurers looked at each other at the unexpected noise, stiff with fright.

Scrr…

Scrape.

Scrrrape…

Scrape.

The sound came from deep in the darkness.

Trembling, Apprentice Priestess raised the lantern.

Something black and glimmering resolved into the shape of a huge insect. It shone as though covered in oil. One of them, two…then many, many more. Even at a quick count, it was clear they numbered greater than ten.

While reaching out with their long, thin antennae, the creatures approached slowly.

They were coming straight for the adventurers, jaws wide.

“Oh—”

Apprentice Priestess’s voice caught in her throat, before—

“Noooooooo!”

“Idiot! Don’t shout, run!”

The pair grabbed what they could and scrambled out of the sewers in a panic.

A terrible scraping sound told them the black insects were still right on their heels.

How far was it to the exit, again?

Rookie Warrior reflected: he wouldn’t ask for a dragon. Maybe goblins, at least—although they could drag out your final moments and make it horrific. But of all things, the way he least wanted to die was to be eaten alive by giant roaches.


§

The spring twilight was warm, as if heralding the coming of summer.

“Hrg…ggrrh…”

Rookie Warrior woke to a morning light that pierced his eyes, stretching on the hay to work out his stiff body.

He took a deep breath and exhaled, the air an unpleasant blend of alcohol and animal musk.

Greeting a new day in the stables was still better than being in the sewers.

The Adventurers Guild had an inn, of course, but it wasn’t free. True, they were all “economy” rooms—though the beds were just blankets pulled over wooden boards.

They were hardly suites, but…

“I just don’t have the money.”

He let out a slow breath. The previous day’s adventure went firmly in the “loss” column of his finances.

One antidote, one sword, and—because they hadn’t met the requested quota—no reward.

He could survive today, because he at least had some money he had scrimped and saved in the past. But at this rate, it wouldn’t be long before he would have to cart his meager possessions back home, or—if he was especially unlucky—maybe even become a serf or a prostitute.

It had only been a few months earlier that Rookie Warrior had rushed away from his small farming village to become an adventurer. The reason was that Apprentice Priestess, an old friend of his, had set out to train and seemed likely to die if left to her own devices.

Her perspective, on the other hand, was that she had accompanied him on “some kind of warrior training or something” so he didn’t get left for dead in the underbrush somewhere.

He felt he would have to set her straight on this matter at some point.

Well, had felt.

In the months since they had come to the frontier town, they had done nothing but kill rats. And sometimes roaches.

Is this really adventuring work…?

It was enough to cause his dreams to wither on the vine, breaking down his certainty and resolve.

“Stop it, stop it. That’s enough with that kind of thinking.”

He gave himself a shake and plucked a stray piece of hay out of his clothes.

Nearby, a middle-aged man, apparently also an adventurer, snoozed in the deep sleep of a drunk, snoring noisily.

Across from them, the horses shot dirty looks at the humans who presumed to share their sleeping space.

He didn’t see Apprentice Priestess anywhere.

As disappointed as he had been, Rookie Warrior still had enough pride to allow her to sleep in one of those simple beds.

“Hokay! Today’s another day!”

Pretending to be in a good mood is close enough to actually being in a good mood, right? He gave a yell, grabbed his stuff, and raced out of the stable.

Heading straight to the well, he drew up a bucket and splashed water all over his face. Using the cloth at his waist, he began scrubbing vigorously. There were still no signs of any new ability to grow a beard.

“I’ll start to look more like a hero soon…I hope.”

Or maybe facial hair would just give Apprentice Priestess a reason to point and laugh at him. Rookie Warrior groaned.

In any case, there was a lot to do.

With the minor task of making himself presentable out of the way, the boy went straight back to the stables. He grabbed a small spade from the rack of farm tools and headed around back.

“Hmmm. Now, where did I put it…?”

The exhausted state he had been in upon returning the night before left him with only a hazy recollection of what was where.

He rustled about on the ground for a minute, searching for something, before, with an “Ah, it’s there,” he found the most recent traces of disturbed earth.

He drove the shovel into the dirt, bracing a foot against it and digging for a while.

After a bit of work, he pulled his equipment out of the ground—his armor and shield.

He had had them made shortly after arriving in town, using his meager funds. They were cheap, but without equal. This was equipment he knew he could rely on.

There was, of course, a reason he had buried them.

“…Erk. They stink…hrrm. Well, still for the best, I guess.”

He brought his face close to them and sniffed.

Tumbling into the pile of sewage hadn’t bothered him when they had been in a hurry to escape. The problem had been when they got back to the surface, and he had realized just how bad it smelled. Not only people in the street, but even his fellow adventurers wrinkled their noses and frowned at him.

In the end, when they had returned to the Guild to make their report, the receptionist had smilingly said, “Please go clean up, then come back.”

All the while Apprentice Priestess had stood there, bright red and shaking, staring at the ground…

We messed up…, he had thought slowly.

In the end, although he wasn’t much used to it, he washed his clothes, dried them, and rinsed himself off before changing.

After some consideration about what to do with his leather armor and shield, he had decided the only thing was to bury them in the ground and hope it would take some of the stench off.

The odor had improved a little, or so he hoped, so he wiped off the dirt with a cloth and equipped himself.

He wouldn’t have had the courage to leave his precious equipment simply lying around even if he had been in a rented room, much less staying in the stables as he was.

“Erk…”

His stomach began rumbling, accompanied by a painful sensation.

Rookie Warrior instinctively put a hand to his abdomen and looked around with a touch of panic. There was no one there. No one around to hear.

Now that he thought about it, he had only had some water to drink the day before.

The sky was blue, the morning sun shining brightly.

Rookie Warrior heaved a sigh.

“…Guess I better get something to eat.”


§

“…You’re late.”

Apprentice Priestess was already at the tavern.

She was in the corner, and the room was alive with adventurers even at this early hour.

She was resting her chin on her hands and looking annoyed; Rookie Warrior sat at the table with a short apology.

“Oh,” he added, “and good morning. Breakfast?”

“I already ate,” Apprentice Priestess said brusquely, but then she muttered her response to his greeting. “Morning. Anyway. Just hurry up and eat. I want to head down again in the afternoon if we can.”

There was an empty bread plate in front of her. At his seat, there were beans, bacon soup, and bread.

Rookie Warrior opened his mouth in confusion, closed it, then opened it again.

“I’m sorry.”

“For what?”

“Ahh…”

It seemed like if he said anything else, he would just make her angry again.

And there’s no need to fight first thing in the morning.

He took a spoon and brought some soup to his mouth. Apprentice Priestess gave a hmph.

“And your clothes. Are they still hanging behind the stable?”

“Oh, uh, yeah.” Rookie Warrior nodded. He took a bite of hard bread and swallowed. “They weren’t dry yet.”

“Okay, give them to me later. That stink will never come out the way you wash them. I’ll do it for you.”

“Oh, uh…sorry.”

“I don’t want to end up stinky just because I hang out with you.” And then she turned away from him.

The failure of their last outing had been entirely his fault. “Sorry,” he murmured, focusing on his food.

He tore off a piece of bread, dipping it in the soup. When it was good and soggy, he scooped up some bacon with his spoon and ate everything together. The soup was thin and tasted mostly of salt. He ate without a word, dutifully.

If the guy who was supposed to be the shield was so hungry he couldn’t move, what would their small party do then? This was another part of his job.

All finished, he tossed his spoon on top of his empty plate and nodded.

“Okay. Weapons.”

“It’s a waste just to leave that sword down there.”

“No, but listen,” he said back, pouring some water from the carafe on the table into his glass. “I need a weapon if we’re going to go back and find it.”

“And do you have the money?”

“About that…”

He gulped down his water. Apprentice Priestess reached for the carafe at the same moment he did, so he filled her glass.

“Thanks,” she said, putting both hands around her glass and bringing it to her lips. “You don’t have any, do you? Money, I mean.”

“Maybe I could borrow…”

“Stop that. Don’t take on any debt.”

“Nah. I mean loaner gear or something.”

Borrow a weapon. He thought about some of his acquaintances, wondering if any of them would be willing to lend something.

It might be easy enough to get his hands on a dagger, but that didn’t inspire much confidence.

And to borrow anything like a longsword—like the one he’d lost with a single swing—would count against him.

Trust was not such an easy thing to come by.

He was just giving a deep, involuntary sigh when…

“Hm? What’s up, kid? Pretty early in the morning for such a long face.”

The lighthearted comment sounded above him.

His head jerked up. He saw an adventurer carrying a spear that glinted in the light.

The tag that hung around his neck was Silver—the third rank.

“Oh, uh, well…”

“I’ve got a date, by which I mean an adventure, so I don’t have long. But I’ll listen while I can.”

Rookie Warrior suddenly found himself lost for words. Spearman, renowned as “the frontier’s strongest,” beamed a friendly smile toward him.

The young warrior swallowed. Next to him, Apprentice Priestess jabbed an elbow into his side. He nodded resolutely.

“Uh, actually, I…I lost my weapon on our adventure yesterday.”

“Oh yeah?” Spearman frowned instinctively. “That’s rough,” he said, his voice tinged with apparent sincerity.

“I want to go get it back, but I don’t have a weapon, so…I was thinking maybe there was a chance someone would loan me one…”

“A spare you can borrow, huh? …I’ve got some extras, so I could let you use one, but…” Spearman looked Rookie Warrior over from head to toe, then concluded: “I’m not sure you have the strength for it.”

“Erk…”

The slightest sound of embarrassment escaped him.

Rookie Warrior was thin and flexible, but in terms of muscles, he was no match for Spearman.

They just had different body types. Naturally they would use weapons of differing weights.

“And if you lost this one, too, I’ll bet you couldn’t pay me back.”

“True, yes?” Even he can’t bring himself to extort money from a junior adventurer.

A beautiful woman appeared at Spearman’s side, quiet as a shadow except for her murmured words.

She was a witch who wore clothes that accentuated her full, voluptuous figure. Apprentice Priestess found her face turning red, and she averted her eyes.

“And a magical weapon, would surely not, suit you well, no?”

A loaner magical weapon?!

Rookie Warrior’s eyes bulged as Witch whispered and giggled.

For a beginner like him, metal armor was the stuff of dreams. A magical weapon might as well have been distant legend.

I hear you can find them in ruins and labyrinths if you’re really lucky, and I do see them for sale occasionally.

But they were several digits too expensive for him to ever think of owning one.

“So instead, let me, give you something, good.”

Witch retrieved something from her neckline with an elegant motion—a single candle.

It didn’t appear to be the usual white, but bluish—which was, on close inspection, because of the colored letters covering it.

The profusion of characters was carved into the candle in a flowing script that Rookie Warrior could not decipher.

“It’s…” Apprentice Priestess blinked several times. “…a candle?”

“Yes.”

Witch winked and lowered her voice as if she were revealing a deep, dark secret.

“This, see, is a seeking candle…When, you near, the object of your search, it gets, warmer. See?”

A magic item. Rookie Warrior swallowed hard.

There was no need for them to use it themselves. If they sold it, it would bring in more than enough for a good sword…

“Feel free, to, sell it—turn, it into money.”

Her smile seemed to see right through him, and Rookie Warrior found himself staring at the ground. Apprentice Priestess gave him another poke in the side with her elbow.

“Oh, um. I, uh— Th-thanks. Thank you very much.”

“Not, at all. A little, something, to help.”

Rookie Warrior received the item hesitantly as Witch wore an amused expression and smiled.

“Well, then. We have our…date.”

“Yep. Don’t die, kids.”

Spearman gave Rookie Warrior’s hair a parting ruffle and set off at a jaunty pace.

Witch followed right behind him through the Guild doors.

Rookie Warrior set his right hand on his head, where he could still feel that powerful palm.

“…They’re so cool.”

“Yeah.” Apprentice Priestess allowed herself a whisper. “Perhaps…”


§

“Uh-uh, nope, no way!” In the grassy field behind the Guild, Scout Boy was seated and waving his hands frantically. “I lost my own dagger recently. The one I have now is borrowed. If I lent it out, Cap would kill me!”

“You lost it? What happened?”

“It got dissolved by a giant slug.”

“What are you doing?” the rhea Druid Girl asked, raising her eyebrows.

“A giant slug, huh? Lucky you…”

Rookie Warrior pursed his lips, receiving an elbow in the side from Apprentice Priestess. “We’re Porcelain-ranked, while they’re in a Silver party. We can’t compare.”

“You were killing giant rats, right?” Scout Boy asked. Rookie Warrior frowned and nodded.

“And I lost my sword doing it.”

“You’re just lucky it wasn’t a one-of-a-kind item.”

Scout Boy glanced up at where Heavy Warrior was swinging his massive two-handed blade.

There was a whoosh as it sliced through the air, and then a thud as Female Knight leaped in.

The two-handed sword prevented him from carrying a shield, but the ease with which he wielded it was a testament to the magic power he’d been given.

Strike, block, hit, parry, slam, overhead swing, deflect, cut, repel.

His weapon was finely crafted, as was his armor. The shine of the carefully worked weapon was unmistakable even in the sunlight.

“…Wish I had one of those.”

“One of what?”

“That greatsword,” Rookie Warrior said, resting his chin on his hands. “A two-handed blade.”

“Forget it,” Apprentice Priestess said, her eyes widening. “Even if you had one, think what would happen.”

“Yeah, whatever.”

“Does she mean he’d only ever cut thin air?”

“She means he’d never hit anything.”

Scout Boy and Druid Girl’s chatter caused Rookie Warrior to turn away in annoyance.

“If I did hit something, though, it’d be awesome.”

“Those weapons are so heavy, you’d be exhausted before long.”

“But I’d look really cool.”

“And they’re not cheap, either.” Apprentice Priestess wagged her finger reprovingly at Rookie Warrior, and there was nothing he could do but keep quiet.

“It’s like she cast Silence on you!” Scout Boy barked a laugh. “Boy, has she got you under her thumb!”

“Oh,” Druid Girl said with a quiet snort and a calm expression, flicking her leaf-shaped ears. “As though you wouldn’t waste all our money if I didn’t hold the purse strings.”

Scout Boy had brought the rebuke on himself. He gave a click of his tongue, and Druid Girl nodded in satisfaction. Then she asked, “Hey, what if you asked the Guild for advice?”

“You mean about borrowing a weapon?”

“No, how to kill giant rats. Maybe they have some tips.”

“Hmmm.” Apprentice Priestess made a low sound. “I wonder if it could be that easy.”


§

“I’m afraid it’s not that easy.”

Of course not.

Guild Girl shook her head slowly at Apprentice Priestess, putting her hand to her cheek and looking troubled.

“I thought not…”

“We ask adventurers to do it because it’s not easy, essentially.”

“If anyone could do it, there wouldn’t be any work, huh…,” Rookie Warrior said. “Oh, one antidote, please.”

“Of course, here you go.”

Apprentice Priestess took the proffered bottle and stowed it carefully in her item bag. At least the bitter memory of when she had run and tripped, shattering one inside her pack, served a purpose.

“Say, how about a healing potion?” added Guild Girl.

“I’d love one, but…you know, the money… Do you have any bandages, or herbs, or ointments?”

“It really isn’t that easy, is it? Still, though…” Guild Girl cleared her throat with an air of importance. “There may be something I can teach you…”

“Really?!” Rookie Warrior rattled his chair as he leaned out over the counter.

It was past noon, and there were few other adventurers to be seen in the Adventurers Guild.

Most of them had already selected their quests and set off enthusiastically for adventure.

Rookie Warrior and Apprentice Priestess had waited until this moment to ask for help, and they would have hated to go home without so much as a single hint.

“Anything! Anything at all!”

“Well, it really is a very obvious idea…” Guild Girl raised her pointer finger, which emphasized the neatly trimmed nail. “Strengthen your defense. At least have some chain mail, or something similar, so the rats and giant roaches can’t bite you.”

“But we don’t have any money…!” All of Rookie Warrior’s excitement dissipated, and the chair clattered again as he slumped back, his voice utterly dejected.

Guild Girl leaned her head to the side, causing her roughly braided hair to spill down.

“You can get a slight discount if you buy used equipment.”

“Don’t they get that from dead people?” Apprentice Priestess asked a bit coldly, and Guild Girl made a how rude sound of displeasure.

“Some of it comes from retired adventurers, or people who traded up. We don’t carry anything cursed.”

“But you do have items from dead people, right?”

“Well, we… But never if they became undead…” Guild Girl looked hesitant for a moment. But soon she wore her smile again. “Anyway, gear is gear, right?”

Rookie Warrior heaved a sigh.

And no money is no money.

“Any other ideas…?”

“Let’s see… Oh, are you using a lantern?”

“Yes, the one from the Adventurer’s Toolkit,” Apprentice Priestess said a bit wearily. The Adventurer’s Toolkit contained rope, a lantern, chalk, and several lengths of chain, all in one place. So far, only the lantern had been much use to them, and she sort of regretted buying it.

“There are people who use a torch instead of a lantern, because it doubles as a weapon.”

Guild Girl mentioned with a smile that rats and insects both despised fire.

“What kind of adventurer would do something like that?”

“Well, for one—”

Guild Girl stopped suddenly, and it was as though a flower had bloomed across her face.

Rookie Warrior followed her gaze, finding the entrance to the Guild.

The saloon-style doors creaked open, and the nose-prickling odor of iron came wafting in.

It was hard to blame Rookie Warrior for the “Ergh” that escaped him.

A most curious adventurer appeared in the entrance.

He wore a cheap-looking steel helmet and grimy leather armor, a small shield was tied to his arm, and a primitive club hung at his waist.

He was the adventurer called Goblin Slayer.

“G-Goblin Slayer, sir, I told you, it’s too soon…”

“Is it?”

A priestess in white vestments soiled to a gruesome red-black came hurrying in after him.

Goblin Slayer’s reply was brief. He acknowledged the two at the reception counter, then started walking with his bold stride. He sat down on the bench in the waiting area with a thump. Priestess collapsed next to him.

Guild Girl, wiggling her fingers down by her side in a sort of signal, squinted as if to say, It can’t be helped.

“You have to clean up. I’m always telling you. People will misunderstand,” she grumbled. Then she noticed the expressions on the faces of Rookie Warrior and Apprentice Priestess. “Are you two all right?”

“Oh, we, uh…”

“Um…” Apprentice Priestess scratched her cheek awkwardly. “We said something rather…rude, before.”

She was talking about something from several months earlier, but the event was still fresh in their memories.

They had thought he might be trying to use his rookie companion as bait.

Now it seemed like a terribly inappropriate thing to think, but at the time they had been convinced they had to rescue Priestess.

“Ah!” said Guild Girl with a giggle, catching on. “I’m sure it’s fine. He doesn’t let those sorts of things bother him.”

“Yeah, but it bothers us…” Rookie Warrior said, and then blinked. He rubbed his eyes with his sleeve. Something was off.

The newcomer wore a cheap-looking steel helmet and grimy leather armor, a small shield was tied to his arm, and a primitive club was at his waist.

A club?

“…Doesn’t he use a sword?”

“Now that you mention it…” Apprentice Priestess looked in Goblin Slayer’s direction, too. “…I guess he does. A really cheap-looking one, though.”

“Yeah, you’re right.”

“And that girl is covered in blood spatters…”

What in the world happened? The young pair looked very worried, but Guild Girl only gave a chuckle and a smile.

“Wondering about them?” she asked, pointedly tapping some papers against her desk to straighten them. “The best way to learn about adventuring is to ask an adventurer.”

“S-sure…”

But that person was Goblin Slayer.

Then again, he was also an adventurer of the third, Silver, rank.

But…he was also Goblin Slayer…

“…Okay, then!”

It was Apprentice Priestess who stood up with all the enthusiasm she could muster.

“H-hey, what—?”

“Asking,” she said, staring fixedly forward, “costs nothing!”

Then she left the floundering Rookie Warrior and started marching forward with an air of determination.

Rookie Warrior glanced at Guild Girl. She was still smiling.

“Aww, man…!”

Now Rookie Warrior rallied himself and stood.

Guild Girl’s expression, of course, never changed.


§

“Umm…,” Apprentice Priestess called out, eliciting only a tired “Wuh?” from Priestess.

It was clear she had just finished an adventure with Goblin Slayer. Apprentice Priestess frowned, only now realizing that she should have chosen a better time.

“What is it?”

“Eep…”

And on top of that, there was that low-pitched, dispassionate, almost mechanical voice.

The steel helmet moved slowly, with a piercing gaze beyond the visor. The man’s armor was covered in dark bloodstains.

He really does look like living armor or something…

With that rather untoward thought in her head, Apprentice Priestess swallowed.

“Uh— Um!” Rookie Warrior broke in as if to cover for her. He ignored her complaint of Just a second! and continued in a familiar tone.

“There’s something we’d like to ask you…if it’s okay.”

“What is it?”

Goblin Slayer’s reply was brief, and it was delivered in that same low-pitched voice.

Next to him, Priestess’s head was bobbing from side to side.

“Quietly, please.”

“Oh—erk… S-sorry…” Rookie Warrior replied in a strained voice. His hands were stiff, and shaking a bit from nervousness.

Apprentice Priestess took his hand gently. It was rough and covered in scars.

“…Was it pretty bad, this job?”

“We needed some money.” But, no. Goblin Slayer shook the helmet from side to side. “I was made to go along.”

Rookie Warrior swallowed heavily and squeezed Apprentice Priestess’s hand back.

“Well, we… We wanted to ask you something.” He took a single deep breath. His hands relaxed. “Why are you using a club?”

The answer came in a single swoop: “I stole it from a goblin.”

“S-stole it?”

“You throw a blade, or stab with it. It breaks or chips. Careful use can help, but a single sword is not good for more than five of them.”

That sort of sounded like an answer… And then again, sort of not.

Wait… Maybe it is.

“Hrrm,” grunted Rookie Warrior. Then he paused for a long moment. “What about rats or roaches?”

Now it was Goblin Slayer’s turn to grunt. “Rats or roaches?”

“…Yeah.”

“I couldn’t tell you.” But… He tapped the club at his belt. “…If you swing this and hit with it, you will damage them. At least you don’t have to worry about the blade chipping.”

Goblin Slayer rose from the bench, tremendously slowly. Priestess, who had been leaning on him, gave a shudder.

“It’s easy.”

“Easy…”

“I’m going,” he said briefly to Rookie Warrior, who stood thinking. Then the helmet turned to where Priestess was wiping the sleep from her eyes. “Resting?”

“Oh, n-no, I’m coming!”

“I see.”

Priestess stood, too, hurrying to keep up with the bold pace that carried him quickly away.





But just on the verge of setting off, she turned to the other two adventurers and gave a small bow.

“Oh, um—hey!” Apprentice Priestess said.

“Yes?”

It was now or never.

Apprentice Priestess had called out almost without thinking, but now Priestess tilted her head. “Can I help you?”

“Well, um, we just… Why are you covered in blood?”

“Oh…” Priestess murmured with a look of mild confusion. She blushed ever so slightly. “I…I’d just as soon you…not ask.”

“Oh…oh really?”

“Ah, b-but, I’m not hurt or anything, so don’t worry!” She gave Apprentice Priestess a tired but gallant smile. She was covered in sweat and dirt, but there was no hint of a shadow to her expression.

The level tag that hung at her neck was not Porcelain, but Obsidian.

Apprentice Priestess let out a breath.

“Hey…”

“Yes?”

“Sorry about before.”

“?”

“I think we seriously misunderstood what was going on.”

Priestess’s eyes widened, and she blinked several times. “—Don’t worry about it!” And then suddenly, the calm, serious girl gripped her staff with both hands. “It’s totally fine. I know how he looks, but he’s a good person…”

“Not coming?” a gruff voice called from a ways off.

“We should talk when we get a chance,” Priestess said, and then she bowed to the two of them. Putting one hand on her head to keep her cap on, she ran over to where Goblin Slayer stood.

“Anything wrong?” he asked.

But she replied, “No, nothing.”

“You’re exhausted?”

“Oh, no… Um. Well, maybe I’m a little tired.”

“Rest a bit.”

Even from a distance, the two of them could see Priestess smile just a little as she answered, “Yes, sir.”

Apprentice Priestess exhaled and shrugged her shoulders.

“I guess…”

“Huh?”

“We’ll have to try our best, too.”

“Uh-huh!”

With that, Rookie Warrior and Apprentice Priestess gently bumped their fists together.


§

“All riiiight! Here we go!”

“Okay, let’s go down the list!”

On the outskirts of town, just after dawn, with the bluish-purple haze of morning still hanging in the air, the voices of a boy and girl could be heard near the sewage ditch.

“Antidote!”

“Check!”

“First-aid supplies!”

“Ointments and herbs, check!”

“Light!”

“The lantern from the Adventurer’s Toolkit, some oil, and a torch! What about you?”

“The Seeking Candle… Umm, map!”

“Check! By which I mean I borrowed it when we accepted our quest.”

“Fair enough. Now, armor!”

“My leather armor still kind of stinks…my shield, too. Here, you give me a spin.”

“Me? It’s not like I plan to get attacked wearing these vestments.”

“I don’t care, just show me. Otherwise, what’s the point of a checklist?”

“Yeah, fine… Last, weapons!”

“Check!”

And with that, Rookie Warrior took his primitive, but brand-new, club in his right hand.

It was so pristine, it might still have had a price tag attached. The average buyer would have considered it a cheap item, but the young man could hardly think it so.

“Good,” Apprentice Priestess said, nodding at the club. She spread her arms wide and spun around once. The sleeves of her white garment puffed out. There were seams and tears in places, but it was still clean and attractive.

“Look okay?”

“You might want to do some mending later.”

“If I have anything to mend with…” Apprentice Priestess put her hands on her hips and, with a serious expression, gave a shout. “If we don’t meet our quota today, that’s it! We’re finished!”

“I don’t think things are quite that bad…”

“But that’s the attitude you have to go in with!”

Rookie Warrior seemed to be relaxed; Apprentice Priestess gave him a smart smack with her sword-and-scales. “We don’t even have the money to go back home. You would end up a serf, and I would be…you know…”

“A prostitute? Pfft, who would take you?”

“How dare you say that, jerk!” Her face turned bright red, and her elbow found the boy’s side—right where his armor was tied.

She looked at him quivering and writhing, and then she snorted.

“Anyway, you understand?”

“Y-yeah, I do, but… Well, yeah.” Rookie Warrior steadied himself, adjusted his grip on his items, and nodded energetically. “We’ll manage it somehow!”

This was a frontier town, one of the places people had labored to claim, and there was a sewer here because, of course, someone had built it.

It was one thing when a city was built above some old ruins, like the water town was, but there were no public services in an unoccupied field. Dwarven craftsmen and wizards, accomplished builders of all sorts, had been called in to create the stone sewer from scratch.

Had the sewer been built because the town was prospering, or had the town prospered because the sewer was built? Rookie Warrior did not know which had come first.

Heck, I don’t even know how it works.

Beyond the rusted metal doors and down a flight of stairs was a dim, dank stone dungeon.

A walkway ran along the canal that carried the wastewater, and a rotten stench drifted across everything.

Without hesitating, Rookie Warrior covered his mouth with a cloth; Apprentice Priestess scrunched up her face and put in nose plugs.

The sewer was new, but giant rats and giant roaches were drawn to filth.

For some reason, Non-Praying Characters—the NPCs—seemed to naturally appear in such places. All the more reason to get rid of them before some even bigger threat came along…

“So which way do we go?”

“Oh, um, hang on!”

As Rookie Warrior stood with what, for him, passed for constant vigilance, Apprentice Priestess hurriedly fished something out.

She took a flint and lit the lantern, then hung it at her waist. She opened it and touched the flame to the candle.

The Seeking Candle burned with a weird blue-white flame; she could feel it getting gradually warmer in her hand.

“…How is it?”

“It’s warm, but still just kind of…”

“Be sure to keep my sword firmly in your mind.”

They were there to find a sword, true, but they were also there to kill rats. They had a quota to meet.

Rookie Warrior, determined that they would accomplish everything they had come for, set off, turning down several sewer tunnels until finally they found themselves deep within.

It was the nest of the giant rats, which they had finally located after their many dives in search of it.

“…Ooh, here they are.”

Perhaps it was the current that brought so much of the food waste from town here.

That was what the oversized rats were after. One of them, two…

Rookie Warrior spat on his hand and rubbed it into the hilt of his weapon, then he dove at the creatures.

“Yaaaaaahh!”

“GYUUI?!”

One of them fled from him, but he took the one that was focused on its meal.

There was a blunt sound of impact that was entirely different from striking with a sword. He felt the weapon connect with the lump of flesh.

The giant rat screeched and tumbled away, but it was still alive.

“You—die—now!”

He had long ago discarded any sense of sympathy for the monsters. It was kill or be killed. If they got their teeth in his windpipe, it was he who would die.

“Whoa! Yah!”

The giant rat jumped up and leaped at him, fangs bared.

Rookie Warrior met it with his shield, throwing his weight behind it in a body blow. His left arm, the one with the shield on it, tingled with the impact of a hunk of meat weighing nearly ten kilograms.

“Why—you—!”

But Rookie Warrior had the advantage when it came to body weight.

He braced himself against the grimy walkway to keep from tumbling, then brought his club down on the rat’s head.

There was no technique, no secret. A back-alley fistfight had more sophistication.

“GYU?!”

There was a crack like the breaking of a wet branch as the rat’s spine broke. Another blow. The giant rat twitched.

He checked that its eyes were empty, and only then did Rookie Warrior finally wipe the sweat from his brow.

“Wh-what about the o-other one…?!”

“It already ran away.”

Rookie Warrior scanned the area, while the girl nervously holding the sword-and-scales let out a breath.

She walked briskly up to him and with a practiced eye checked him over for any wounds.

Rookie Warrior closed his hand as if making sure it still worked, then opened it; then he shifted his arms and legs as well.

He was unhurt. He hadn’t been bitten. The rat was frothing blood, but none of it had gotten on him.

“I’m…fine.”

“…Looks like it.”

Good. Apprentice Priestess nodded. They wouldn’t need to use their antidote or any of their healing items.

“So how did the club work out?”

“I’m not real sure yet…” Rookie Warrior gave a careless swing of the weapon. It wasn’t sharp like a sword, but it was heavier than one, and that made it feel oddly trustworthy. “But I do know that if I hit something with it, it dies.”

He couldn’t help a sigh, thinking how far he was from the breezy attitude of Spearman or the sturdiness of Heavy Warrior.

It was just one rat.

But it was a good start.


§

“What’s the candle say?”

“Hm…I guess this way is a little warmer?”

Each time they came to a fork in the road, Apprentice Priestess would hold up the candle to find the right direction, and then they would proceed.

Unfortunately—if perhaps predictably—the sword was not where they had left it after the previous day’s battle. Maybe the giant rats had carried it off, or the giant roaches had pushed it aside…

“They’re not goblins. They aren’t just hoarding loot.”

“Hey, don’t say that, it’s scary.” Apprentice Priestess glared at Rookie Warrior and gave him another jab with her elbow. “If they were really goblins living under this town, it wouldn’t be funny.”

“For sure.”

Then they would have to ask Goblin Slayer for more than just advice.

They continued their diligent search, complaining about the stench.

Along the way, they met—and dispensed with—a total of three giant rats. And one giant roach.

The club was soon covered in a thick slime, already speaking to the story of its battles.

“I guess I didn’t think about how it would make blood and…are those brains? …splatter.”

“Well, you saw how dirty that goblin guy—” Apprentice Priestess stopped herself. “How dirty Goblin Slayer got.”

The new weapon was heavy, too, and having to swing it over and over in battle tired him out much quicker than a sword.

“But I like how you can just swing it without having to aim.”

“Just try not to lose it or anything.”

“Yeah—”

Rookie Warrior grunted his agreement with this opinion as he peeked around a corner.

There only seemed to be regular-sized rats there at the moment, so there was no problem.

Beckoning to Apprentice Priestess behind him, he went ahead one step at a time.

Apprentice Priestess gave a little yelp at the rats’ long tails as they stepped around the rodents.

“Oh, yeah…”

“What is it? Got another silly comment to make?”

“No.” Rookie Warrior shook his head hurriedly, checked to the left and right to make sure they were safe, then sat in the path. “Do we have any string?”

“Will rope work?”

“Too thick.”

“I’ve got some string for holding my hair back…”

“Thanks.”

She dug through her bag, then handed the hair tie to him, saying, “Be sure to give it back.” Then she crouched next to Rookie Warrior and watched intently as he set to some kind of work.

“When we get some money, I’ll buy you a new one.”

“It comes out of your share, okay?”

“Yeah, sure.”

The job was fine, but simple enough. He wrapped the string firmly around the handle of the club until it made a loop of a specific size.

When he put his hand through it to hold the club…

“See? Now I won’t drop it.”

“Hmm…” Apprentice Priestess inspected the jury-rigged strap closely, then gave a snort. “That’s a pretty good job, for you.”

“Ouch, that hurts.”

“When we get back, I’ll put on a better one for you.”

Apprentice Priestess stood with a giggle, but when she lifted the candle to check it—

“Whoa, yikes!”

—she nearly dropped it, frantically adjusting her grip to keep a hold on it.

“Hey, what’s wrong?” Rookie Warrior stood, too, holding his club in case there was trouble.

He was inexperienced, but still looked around carefully, his shield up. The girl shook her head.

“It-it’s nothing. Just…the candle’s getting hotter and hotter.”

“It’s getting hotter? So that means…”

He could see that the bluish-white flame of the Seeking Candle had grown noticeably larger.

Rookie Warrior and Apprentice Priestess looked at each other.

“We must be getting close.”

It was critically good luck that allowed him to sense that something was coming at them from above.

Rookie Warrior immediately moved to cover Apprentice Priestess, giving her a shove as he got them both out of the way.

“Eek! Wh-what are you—!”

“Idiot, look!”

It was like a massive black lump.

It must have been six feet long, almost twice the usual size. It had a lustrous carapace and six spined legs, and it was waving antennae that looked like lengths of thin steel wire and gnashing its sharp-toothed jaws.

“What’s the candle say…?!”

“It’s really hot!”

“Don’t tell me it’s inside that thing!”

The bug—it was beyond giant, a huge roach—scuttled toward them. The two screamed and started running.


§

“Wh-wh-what do we do?!”

“I wish I knew…!”

The massive black insect crawling indiscriminately across ceiling, floor, and walls was more than a little terrifying.

The pursuit itself wasn’t the only scary thing. It was the thought of being eaten alive by that creature.

They hadn’t become adventurers just to become a feast for some rats or roaches…!

“It’ll catch us at this rate…!”

That they were still safe as they dashed desperately through the sewers was thanks to the speed of their reaction and the distance they’d had to begin with.

A giant roach was nowhere near as agile as a human—at least not a Porcelain-ranked adventurer.

But it was obvious they didn’t have long before it caught and devoured them.

We have to get to the surface before… No, we’ll never make it…!

They would have to climb a ladder to get aboveground. If they were attacked at that moment, it would be over. Regular roaches could fly. Giant ones probably could, too.

“How about we jump in the water?!”

“A lot of good that will do us if we catch the plague!”

“Okay then… A narrow tunnel! Maybe it won’t be able to follow us!”

“It won’t work! Roaches are extremely flexible!”

A narrow passageway might give them a moment’s respite, but then the bug would squeeze itself in with them. Just the thought was enough to give him a chill. No tunnels, then.

“We have to fight!”

“But how?!”

The scratching made him viscerally sick, and it was coming closer.

Rookie Warrior looked down at the club in his hand.

If he hit the roach enough times, it would die. He was sure of that. But how to do it?

If I just swing at it, I’ll never hit it.

It was so fast. If he couldn’t stop it from moving, the battle would be hopeless. He just didn’t have the skill.

“H-hey! Do you think you could hit it with Holy Smite?!”

“I don’t know…! The gods are the ones who aim the spell, not me!”

“What if it were coming straight at you?!”

“In that case, maybe…!”

“Okay!”

Now he would have to think fast. If he was going to do it, he couldn’t hesitate.

Rookie Warrior grabbed the lantern from Apprentice Priestess’s waist.

“Yikes! H-hey, what are you—?!”

“You can scold me if we survive!”

Shouting even louder than Apprentice Priestess, Rookie Warrior looked back.

The humongous insect was right there, slime dribbling from its chomping jaws.

Rookie Warrior took a deep breath.

“Try this on for size!”

And then he threw the lantern right in front of the insect.

The impact with the floor shattered the lantern’s cheap casing, and fire leaped up from the flame within.

The massive roach gave a screech, spread its wings, and rose into the air. The sight alone was enough to make them lose their will to fight it.

Rookie Warrior felt something warm and wet in his pants. He set his jaw to stop his chattering teeth.

“Now—do it!”

“—Ee—ehh—ahhh—!”

In response to Rookie Warrior’s shout, Apprentice Priestess, who had been trembling dumbly, raised the sword-and-scales.

“Lord of judgment, sword-prince, scale-bearer, show here your power!”

A crackling bolt of lightning drove straight into the filthy bug.

There was a crack of thunder, and a brilliant, bluish-white light banished the dim darkness of the sewers. The miracle lasted only for an instant.

Smoke that reeked of ozone and burned chitin erupted from the monster, turning their stomachs.

The huge roach fell to the ground, its abdomen hideously exposed, struggling to rise again with its six limbs.

“H-hii—yaaaaaahhh!”

Rookie Warrior lifted his club and jumped at it. He scrambled onto the black abdomen, ignoring the thorny legs clawing at him, and shoved his shield against its jaws. Dark pincers dug into the oiled leather, but his focus was complete. With an animal scream, he raised the club and brought it down, striking, breaking, again and again.

He paid no heed to the slime flying from the jaws, nor to the blood seeping from his scratches. If he did, he would be killed.

The sweaty grip slipped from his hand. The string he had tied around it allowed him to regain his hold. And he struck again.

Strike and strike and strike and strike and strike and strike. Whatever happens, just strike. As many blows as possible. Beat it until it dies.

“Hoo…ahh…huff…ahh…”

Finally, he had reached his limit. He didn’t have enough oxygen.

He tried to clear his head, his vision reddened by the heat of his body, but the effort made him dizzy. Then Apprentice Priestess was there, supporting him just as he thought he would fall over.

“Are—are you okay…?!”

“I…I think so.”

The boy registered that he was covered from head to toe in the roach’s juices. His right hand, gripping his club, was especially bad.

Where the insect’s head should have been, there was only a spreading pool of fluids.

The six legs, scrabbling with the last vestiges of life, were still to be feared.

“Is it…still alive…?” Apprentice Priestess asked.

“K-keep back. It’s…dangerous.”

Rookie Warrior swallowed heavily, then drew his work dagger from his belt. He used it to saw through each leg at the lowest joint until it finally broke off. He had to do this, or they wouldn’t be safe. Six times he did it, until his fingers were stiff and terribly painful. But it still wasn’t over.

“Um…the abdomen, right?”

He held the dagger in a two-handed reverse grip, raised it, and then brought it down. There was a fsssh and a geyser of fluid from the body.

The blade hit something hard, and then Rookie Warrior steeled himself and reached into the roach’s stomach. He pulled something out.

“Found it…”

He had no idea what the creature had been thinking when it ate this. But the sword he pulled out was unmistakably the one he had so eagerly bought, his first weapon.

“…Starting today, maybe I’ll call this sword Chestburster, and this club Roach Slayer. What do you think?”

“I think you should stop talking stupid and drink this antidote, and then we should go home.”

The boy cut a pathetic figure, every inch of him covered in slime. Some of the stuff had landed on the girl’s waist, which had been bared when the lantern was torn away, and was steaming there.

The two of them pretended not to notice either of these things as they exchanged a dry smile at their great victory.


§

“Sigh…”

The sun was setting on the frontier town.

The two of them had washed head to toe in the river—studiously avoiding any glimpses of each other in only their underpants—and then gone to the Guild to make their report.

They had checked their equipment, restocked the supplies they had used, tended to their scratches, and finally paid for a simple place to sleep.

In the end, all that was left were several silver coins that Rookie Warrior now held in his hand.

This would be their savings. But…how much were we even able to save?

Squatting by the door to the Adventurers Guild, Rookie Warrior felt like sighing, too.

“Hey, what are you staring into space for, anyway?”

“Hmm…”

Apprentice Priestess, pressing a towel to her wet hair, was just next to him.

Rookie Warrior made a non-answer, his focus on the people coming and going through the door.

Adventurers of every stripe were heading out to town with their special items or coming into the Guild. Each and every one of them was loaded with equipment, fatigue mingling with a sense of achievement on their faces.

The boy and girl did not yet have enough experience to realize this meant no adventurers had died that day.

“I was just…thinking we’ve got a long way to go.”

“Well, obviously,” Apprentice Priestess said with a snort, sitting down next to Rookie Warrior. “A little progress each day! The trouble starts when you want more than that.”

“W-well, sure, but…”

“Do your best, sacrifice, make your money, and live your life. Can’t complain about that, can you?”

“W-well, sure, but…” The silver coins in his hand shimmered in the evening light. The bright glints from the metal hurt his eyes. “…We’ve got a long way to go.”

“…That’s true.”

But I—even I—was able to deal with some giant rats and roaches today.

It wouldn’t make for much of a legend, but there was no denying he had put his life on the line.

“All right! Let’s get some decent food!” he said, and thrust the coins at Apprentice Priestess.

“…Yeah. I guess we can indulge a bit today.”

Someday—someday—someday.

They wanted to be brave. They wanted to be heroes.

They wanted to be adventurers who might defeat a dragon.

The coins rattled in the girl’s palm as she stood.





“Come on, how late are you gonna sleep? Wake up!”

The boy heard the familiar voice of his older sister in the morning air.

He moved lazily with many an oof and aaah and other inarticulate sounds, until a bright light pierced his eyes.

Dawn—it was morning.

“It’s morning?!”

The boy threw himself out of his straw bed and gave a great stretch.

He sucked in a breath of air that was cold and comfortable. A fragrant aroma of some sort wafted by.

Bread!

It was breakfast.

“If you don’t hurry and get up, there won’t be any breakfast left!”

“I know!” he shouted back to his sister, then quickly changed into his clothes.

If it was already morning, then he couldn’t waste another minute, not another second. Plus, he was hungry.

When I close my eyes, morning comes right away—so why do I get so hungry?

Maybe his sister would know. He wanted to ask, but right now breakfast was more important.

“Morning, Sis!”

“I think you mean good morning,” she said in annoyance as he came flying into the kitchen (and dining room, and living room—it was a small house). “Sheesh. That’s why we have to have her look after you.”

“Hrk… She’s got nothing to do with this.” When his sister brought up his longtime friend who lived in the house next door, the boy adopted the same displeased expression as her.

The neighbor was younger than him, but she could do pretty much anything, so everyone treated him like he was younger and made her responsible for him. He would complain to his sister about it, but she would only smile. You would think an older sister might take her little brother’s feelings into account a bit more.

“Never mind that, just you eat.”

“…Yes, Sis.”

His objection was ruthlessly dismissed, and she gestured for him to sit at the table with a wave of a large spoon.

The dishes on the table included bread, still steaming warm, and a soup made of milk. There were fried eggs on the days when the chickens had laid, but it didn’t happen that often. His favorite thing was stew, which they could only make when they had killed one of the chickens.

His stomach ached with the delicious smells.

He took up a spoon, determined not to let any of it go cold.

“Hey, say your prayers!” his sister, who seemed to have eyes in the back of her head, said as she checked the soup.

The boy regretfully put the spoon back on the table and clasped his hands.

“O One who is bigger than the rivers and wider than the seas, thank you for granting us the wisdom to obtain this food.”

“Right, good!”

It was typical in these pioneer villages to believe in the Earth Mother, and the boy took pride in the fact that his family was different. His sister had learned to read, write, and do math at the temple of the God of Knowledge and was even starting to teach there herself. It was what had allowed them to survive even after their parents died—and for that, they had to be thankful to the deity.

But… the boy thought. He sipped some soup, then tore off a piece of bread and soaked it in the soup before eating it. Me, I want to be an adventurer.

It was certainly not something he could tell his sister.


§

“Just be sure to stay out of the Eastern Woods!”

“I know!”

“Come back at noon and go to the temple!”

“I know, I know!”

With his sister harping at him from behind, the boy set off down a path he’d known since birth.

Well, maybe not since birth, exactly…

On his back rattled the wooden sword his sister had recently given him for his birthday. One of his favorite games these days was swinging it around and pretending he was an adventurer. Of course, in his mind, it wasn’t pretend.

My party’s one short today.

The girl next door was going into town that day. Not fair. Not fair at all.

“Even I haven’t been to see town yet.” He drew his sword and took a few thoughtless stabs at the underbrush.

“You there, boy! Don’t you be swingin’ that thing where there are people around, it’s dangerous!”

Of course, a middle-aged farmer standing kitty-corner spotted him and called out. He must have been watering his fields. There was a sound as he stretched out his stooped hips.

“…Yes, sir.” The boy understood that what he did reflected on his sister, and he obediently sheathed the sword. “I’m sorry.”

“Y’be careful, now.” Pounding gently on his lower back, the farmer began ambling away from his field, smiling at being on a short break. He came up beside the boy and let out a long breath, taking a hand towel from his waist and wiping his own face. He was covered in earth and dust and mud and sweat, and the towel was quickly stained brown.

“Where’s that gal you’re always with?”

“Her? She’s in town today,” the boy said with a hint of annoyance, but the farmer just nodded.

“That so? I see… She’s a sweet thing. Maybe she’ll get some pretty clothes in town. Savor the anticipation, boy.”

“I don’t think she looks good in fancy stuff.” He puffed out his cheeks. The farmer patted him with a rough, dirty hand. At the sight of the boy, the farmer laughed again.

“Well, wait till y’see her. Keep it to yourself for now.”

“Hrm…”

“Say, boy. You go t’ the temple at noon, don’t you?”

“Uh-huh. Sis says I have to study.”

“She’s right enough about that.” The farmer nodded, then frowned and gently pounded his lower back with a fist. “Actually, my hips are botherin’ me again. Tell the monks I could use some medicine.”

“Sure. Medicine for your hips, got it.”

The boy nodded, and the farmer’s weathered face blossomed into a wrinkly smile. “Good boy,” he said. “Oh, and boy. You’ve been told to stay clear of the Eastern Woods, haven’t you?”

“Yes, I have,” the boy said, cocking his head. Now that he thought about it… “But why shouldn’t I go there?”

“What, ain’t your sister told you?”

“No. I never asked.”

“Them Eastern Woods—” The farmer folded his arms gravely, letting out a deep sigh. “—There’s goblins there.”


§

“An adventurer, huh? Wonder if they’d really help us.”

Down the crude path out of the pioneer village stood a dense, dark forest.

At the entrance trembled one of the young men of the village—though he was over thirty years old.

The one who had spoken held a rusted old spear, but he looked uneasy and not very reliable. It had, after all, been more than ten years since he had gone off to war carrying that weapon. And even then, the battle had ended while he was still in the rear, and the whole thing had come to nothing.

Now anyone in the village with even a modicum of battle experience had been called on to face the goblins, but they were not very well prepared.

“The Guild can make their promises, but I sure wouldn’t want to run into any bandits…”

“Me, I’m ’fraid of black magic…”

The whispering voices belonged to two anxious-looking men in their twenties.

They held hand axes made for cutting firewood, restlessly adjusting and readjusting their grip.

“I’ve heard you can’t let down your guard for the lady ones, either, or they’ll suck the soul right out of you!”

“Yeah, I heard that, too,” a former soldier said as quietly as he could. “There was a young one, over in the silk-makers’ village across the mountain range?”

“Oh, yeah, there was.”

“Well, she said she didn’t want a long life of eating hard bread. She was going to live a rich, short life as an adventurer.”

“Left home, huh?”

“Sure did. But you know what, it was really because she was in L-O-V-E with an elf girl, a sorceress who’d come to the village.”

“Aww, yikes…”

“’Course, sometimes it’s the other way around. Girls get taken in or raped by adventurers who come to their village all the time, right?”

“That’s enough drivel out of you. Didn’t my grandpa say?” The group’s leader, a man of twentysomething years who looked likely to be the next chief of the village, spoke with a severe expression. “The only villages that ever survived a goblin attack were the ones that hired adventurers.”

“Yeah, but…”

“Or should we send the little devils your daughter as an offering?”

“Hey, now…”

“You must’ve at least heard the story of the traveling merchant whose daughter was dragged off.”

The former soldier nodded in agreement as the timid man whimpered that this was not good, that it did not bear thinking of.

“What I know is my gramps isn’t wrong. He knows a whole lot more about fighting than me.”

“Yeah, but—but they’re goblins. We don’t have to hire any adventurers, right? If we just leave ’em alone, won’t that…?”

“When one or two come along, you can chase ’em off. Goblins aren’t such a big deal.” Their leader shook his head, still looking stern. “But gramps said when they start setting up a nest—they’ll come for our wives and daughters.”

“Yeah…”

“But, look. Ain’t much hope we can kill all those goblins ourselves, is there?” As the former soldier spoke, the timid man gave a squeak as if he were facing death at that very moment.

“Su-su-su-su-sure, we can’t,” he said. “Maybe I could chase off a goblin what came to the village, but…”

“Well, there you have it,” the former soldier said. “This is how adventurers put food on their tables—let them handle it.”

“Tch,” the leader muttered, “what a sniveling, yellow-bellied…”

“Now, now, you’ve got to think of his feelings, too,” the former soldier said evenly, shielding the timid man from the upbraiding. “We know you’re betrothed to the chief’s daughter, and you’re set for the future, but not everyone has that going for them.”

In the face of this argument, everyone fell silent, including the leader.

The young people of the village were all enthralled by adventurers. They wanted to love women, eat delicious food, live the high life. They didn’t want to spend their lives plowing the country dirt. They would sooner fight a dragon. The readiness to face death came easily to their lips, if not to their hearts.

And the young women were much the same. All they could look forward to was becoming one of the empty-headed fools who had nothing but house and farm work to do or serving the god in the temple to pray until the moment of their death. If they were unlucky, they might be attacked and raped by bandits or the like or grow so destitute that selling themselves became their only recourse…

So why shouldn’t they rather spend a night dreaming with an adventurer, or embrace the fantasy of traveling with one? The stronger among them might even want to stake their claim as adventurers just like the men.

“Well, anyone would worry about their own daughter or sister or son or brother.”

Pioneer life on the frontier was cruel.

Monsters were forever appearing, but you certainly could not count on the military to come and protect you. His Majesty the king, whose face you had never even seen, was surely busy dealing with dragons and dark gods and what have you.

A temple where they prayed to the gods on your behalf might be built as a measure of support, and perhaps that was comforting in its own way.

And there were taxes. The rain fell, the wind blew, the sun shone. Some days were cloudy. And there were goblins.

If money ran low there was always prostitution or traveling somewhere to find work…and for young people, it was only natural to dream of becoming adventurers.

If that was what they wanted, they could have simply tried to become employees at the Adventurers Guild in the Capital…

But without an education or money, this, too, was only a dream within a dream.

“I sure hope a good, strong adventurer will come for us…”

“You hope? That’s why the king spends our tax money to build Guilds. No need t’ worry.”

“…Yeah.”

More pressing than their dreams or money were the goblins that were so near at hand.

The three young men looked at each other, then sighed deeply.

That was probably why none of them noticed the boy sneaking quietly into the forest, all alone.


§

Goblins.

What exactly were these creatures the adults were so afraid of?

The boy had never seen one, so now he wanted to get a glimpse.

Then I’ll have something to brag about!

It was the simple logic of a child.

He had heard that goblins were the weakest monsters. He knew, as well, that when one or two had shown up at the village, the adults had driven them off.

If that was true, maybe he could handle them?

And if he could…

I could brag even more!

The boy walked carelessly down a familiar footpath, swinging his wooden sword.

Humans had not made their mark on this forest, and it was dark even at high noon. The trees grew dense; the smells of moss and animals mingled in the air.

He had often been warned how dangerous it was, but today it was especially unsettling. But the danger and the weirdness were why he so often came here to play.

“…Hm?”

The boy stopped when he saw a set of unfamiliar footprints in the place he always went for his games. They were larger than his friend’s footprints, about the same size as his own. They weren’t a wolf’s, or a fox’s, or a deer’s.

“…A goblin?”

The moment he spoke, the wind rustled through the grass and leaves.

He swallowed heavily. He suddenly discovered his mouth was dry, and his throat hurt.

The boy’s palms began sweating, and he quickly readjusted his grip on his sword.

“I-if you’re there, then c-come and get me…!”

Acting brave—though he did not consider it acting—the boy tried his best to look the part.

The wind gusted again, bringing a wet, fetid stink with it.

Where is he?

The boy drew in a breath, let it out. Eventually, he began to move again.

He swept his sword about for no reason, clearing underbrush and branches, striking roots.

Nothing happened. There was only the silence of a forest gone quiet.

No one’s there?

“Pff, I scared him away…”

The boy wiped his brow with an exaggerated motion and went to dry his hands on his shirt. At the touch of it, he realized the fabric was soaked through with sweat, and his heart was pounding.

He swallowed again, shook his head. He raised his voice as if to reassure himself.

“O-okay, let’s head back. Wouldn’t want to worry Sis!”

He turned around—and saw a goblin brandishing a club.

“Ee…eek…”

“GORRB?!”

The goblin seemed almost as surprised as he was. It froze with the club in the air.

The creature was about his height, with dirty eyes and mouth. Pale green skin. And breath like rotting meat.

“A g-g-goblin?!”

“GB?!”

His wooden sword, which he had swung reflexively in fright, smacked the creature in the head with a dull thwack.

The thought that ran through his head was, I did it! And the feeling that ran through his gut was, Oh, no… But this was all too late.

“GGGGG…”

The goblin rose unsteadily, clutching his head. There was a dribble of blood. The boy gasped.

“GOORBOGOOROROB!!”

The goblin let out a howl, its eyes afire, and at the same instant the boy set off like a frightened rabbit.

Run, run, run, run. Stumbling, nearly falling, actually falling, scrambling back to his feet he ran. He didn’t even know if he was heading out of the forest or deeper into it. Once he was off the footpath, there was no way to tell which direction he was going in these woods.

“Ergh…ahhh…!”

He was out of breath. He was gasping for air. His throat stung. His whole body ached. His feet were heavy. But he ran.

There was no time to look back. He did not hear the goblin’s voice, but it might have been because of the ringing in his ears.

“Oh! Wh-where…?!”

The boy had arrived at a place he had never seen.

A clearing, right in the middle of the forest. Had it always been there?

And not only that—to think there would be a cave!

Desperately sucking in air for his spinning head, the boy crawled into the underbrush. It was not out of any intent to hide. He simply couldn’t move another step.

His breathing was faintly audible as he struggled to get it under control.

Then…

“?”

He heard bold, nonchalant footsteps.

He peered out in the direction of the sound, then clapped his hands over his mouth to quiet the “Oh!” that escaped him.

Goblins.

Two of them—and neither had a wound on his head. Did that make three, then?

“GORBBRB…”

“GROB! GBRROB!”

They jabbered to each other, swinging the clubs in their hands, then shared a foul laugh.

The boy could not understand their language, but he could guess what they were saying.

Because he himself had said similar things—to warm up when there was a fight brewing.

They’re going to the village!

He had to warn everyone.

His feet moved without his realizing it. And when his feet moved, the underbrush rustled.

“GBRO…?”

Too late.

The goblin’s hideous yellow eyes turned toward the bush where the boy was frozen.

A stubby finger pointed, and the other goblin gave a hissing, evil cackle.

One step, another. The two goblins approached.

The boy’s teeth chattered. Somehow, he managed to grab his wooden sword. He had to run. He had to…

But how?

“GBOROBR?!”

The next instant, a sword emerged from the throat of the farther goblin.

“GORB?!”

The other goblin turned toward his companion’s cry.

Just behind the creature clawing at the air, spurting blood as he fell, the boy saw him.

He was—he had to be—an adventurer.

A cheap-looking steel helmet. Grimy leather armor. A small, round shield was affixed to his left arm, and he held a sword of a strange length.

He was nothing like the glorious adventurers of fantasy or the boors who sometimes visited their village.

And yet he was, without doubt, an adventurer.

“That’s one.”

The voice was low and dispassionate, almost mechanical. The boy wasn’t sure how it had reached his ears.

The other goblin was bewildered. The monster looked first at the club in his hand, then at the adventurer, then at the entrance to the cave.

And he set off running for the entry.

Revenge, anger, and fear drove him to make for his companions.

In that span, the adventurer pulled his sword from the corpse of the dead goblin.

“Two.”

He raised it and threw.

“GOROB?!”

The goblin pitched forward, writhing, with the blade piercing his spinal column—though the boy did not yet know what a spinal column was.

Finally, the creature on the ground twitched again, then lay still.

“Hrm.”

The adventurer gave a low grunt and walked up to the two bodies with bold, nonchalant steps.

He yanked out the sword, brushing strands of gray matter off it, then clucked his tongue and tossed it away.

Instead, the boy watched him take something like a dagger from the belt of one of the goblins…

“Oh…!”

No— You can’t— There’s more— The words came pouring from him all at once.

“There’s still another goblin out there!”

The adventurer’s reaction was too quick to see. He spun, raised the dagger, and took aim, all in a single motion. There was a whistle of wind, a half-formed scream, and a thump of something heavy falling to the earth.

“GBOROB?!”

The goblin from earlier was behind him, not far away, sputtering and choking on the blood pouring from its throat.

“Oh…!”

Only then did the boy realize how close he had been to being killed himself.

The wooden sword slipped from his shuddering hand, clattering to the ground at his feet.

“That’s three, then.”

Crushing grass and pushing aside the bushes, the adventurer strode closer. His beat-up leather glove picked the wooden weapon up off the ground, then held it out to the boy.

“Huh? Ahh…?”

“Sorry.” As the boy vacantly took the sword, the adventurer continued, quietly and dispassionately, but unmistakably. “Thanks for the help.”

He headed into the cave without a glance behind him, and the boy watched him go.





§

“Why, you—! And after I told you all those times not to go into the woods!”

“I’m really sorry, Sis!”

He had rushed to the temple and tried to cover for himself, but his sister soon found out everything. After all, there was no other place he could play that would have left him so covered in scratches.

She dragged him by the ear all the way home where he endured a storm of lectures, some first aid, and then dinner.

The salve she used stung terribly. She wrapped him in bandages, and finally gave him a good smack that sent the boy jumping a foot in the air.

Honestly, he wished she would be just a little kinder to him, but he couldn’t tell her that.

“Heavens and all. You always say, ‘I know, I know,’ but you don’t know anything.”

These little comments went on all the while they were eating, until at last his sister gave a long sigh.

“Anyway…at least you weren’t seriously hurt.”

Then she smiled with relief.

I really worried her.

The boy felt a pang in his chest at the thought.

“Um…what about the goblins?”

“Don’t worry about them. That adventurer got rid of all of them.”

His sister smiled as brightly as the sun, then scowled and pointed to his bedroom.

“That means there’s nothing to keep you up at night—so go to sleep! Your friend will be back tomorrow, right?”

“Oh, yeah!”

The boy jumped out of his chair, but with his hand on the bedroom door, he turned.

“Good night, Sis. And…I’m sorry.”

“Good night, yourself… Just don’t do anything else dangerous, okay?

“…Sure.”

He opened the door, closed it behind him, and went into his room. He exhaled.

It really had been some day. He had been chased by goblins, attacked by them, and scolded by his sister.

But…

Snuggled into his bed, the boy turned over until he was looking at the wooden sword on the wall.

He had hit a goblin with that sword. An adventurer had picked it up for him.

The lingering nervousness and excitement of that moment still made his heart pound.

“I wonder…what his face looks like.”

I met a real adventurer!

No—that wasn’t all.

I helped a real adventurer and beat some goblins!

Now that was something he could brag about.

It was way cooler than buying some fancy clothes in town.

Satisfied with the outcome of his adventure, the boy closed his eyes, eager for the next day to come.





“Hello, welcome!”

“Heyo. Get us three ales and two lemon waters for starters!”

“Certainly!”

“And, uh…eh, fritellas will do. For five!”

“Sure thing!” the waitress responded brightly, glancing at the adventurer with the two-handed sword across his back and noting the number of fingers he was holding up.

Any tavern would be lively in the early evening, but at the Adventurers Guild tavern, it was different. There were people relaxing after an adventure where they fought for their lives. Others could put themselves at ease at long last as friends returned from far away.

Some customers were adventurers from afar, starting with a meal now that they had arrived in this town.

The padfoot, or beast-girl, waitress rushed from one place to another—she loved this atmosphere. The sense that she was helping people motivated her even more than her salary.

As her long, carefully bound hair swayed like a tail (her real tail was under her skirt), she called to the kitchen.

“Three ales, two lemon waters, and five plates of fritellas!”

“You got it. Nice, big order—makes it easier on me!”

A pudgy, middle-aged rhea moved constantly back and forth across the smallish kitchen.

Pots and pans, knives and skewers, ladles and rolling pins. He wielded fire and cooking implements like magic, and the food was ready in no time flat.

A faintly sweet sauce covered the chicken and fish fried golden in oil. They were crunchy and hot on the outside, and when you bit into them, the juices flowed into your mouth. Padfoots weren’t the only ones sniffing the air at the fragrant aroma.

“There y’go. Take it away!”

“Yes, sir!”

When it came to cooking, there was no race as accomplished as the rheas.

Of course, I added my own little touch!

Her little touches plus the chef’s sheer skill made them, essentially, unparalleled heroes of food.

She drew some ale from a barrel, squeezed a lemon over some well water, and the order was ready.

She pattered over with the meal on a tray to where the party was already seated at a table and waiting eagerly.

Maybe they didn’t want to just leave their armor on until they got home, because each of the party members had removed some of their equipment. That the front-row members nonetheless kept their swords where they could draw them at any time spoke to their long experience.

“Thank you for waiting! Three ales, two lemon waters, and fritellas for five!”

The half-elf light warrior who was in charge of the party’s finances handed her some jangling silver coins.

“Thanks. Oh, and grape wine for me.”

“Sure, I know!”

The waitress took the coins in a meaty hand and put them in the pocket of her apron. They came to a bit more than the amount of the bill—perhaps he was thoughtfully including a tip. Although it was also possible that he was just a philanderer.

“Look, when you go to a tavern, you’re supposed to start with ale, right?” a female knight said as if she couldn’t believe what she was hearing. She rested her chin on her hands.

“There goes our Lady Knight, saying whatever she will again—always good and true to Order!”

“Well, obviously. It’s even written in the Scriptures of the Supreme God,” Female Knight said as if she couldn’t believe it, puffing out her chest.

Light Warrior pressed a hand to his brow as if to stave off a headache and sighed deeply.

“Kids, just don’t grow up to be like her, okay?”

“Yessir!”

“But she looks so cool when she’s all decked out, though…”

Scout Boy raised his hand in affirmation, while Druid Girl gave a troubled sigh.

Female Knight puffed out her cheeks, incensed.

“What are you talking about? I always look cool.”

“Gah! You haven’t even had a sip and you already sound soused.” Heavy Warrior made a shushing motion like he was scolding a baby, then raised his mug of ale. “Now, we have to toast! We’re back from an adventure. Eat and drink all you like, kids!”

“Wooh! Meat! Meat!”

Scout Boy and Female Knight gave a cheer and threw themselves at the food and drink. Their companions watched them with mild exasperation but set to their own meals, as well.

“Finally home…”

“So we are. Good, work, today?”

“You bet! Good work.”

With a jangle of the bell above the door, the next ones to enter were a hale and hearty man carrying a spear and a beautiful, voluptuous woman.

Spearman and Witch slid down into their seats, their faces flush with the satisfaction of a job done.

“Hey there, miss! We’d like to order!”

“Yes, sir! Welcome back!” Padfoot Waitress hurried over to their table, as Spearman languidly raised a hand into the air. “What’ll it be?”

“For me… Let’s, see. Grape wine and, duck, sauté. Can I get, those?”

“Me… Leg of beef—on the bone and plenty grilled. And apple liqueur.”

“Oh, apples…” Witch murmured, narrowing her eyes. Her lips opened the little with a touch of longing, but immediately closed again.

Spearman gave an indifferent shrug. “You want some?”

“Not, necess—”

“Throw in a couple of grilled apples, then. I want one, too.”

“…Hrrrm.”

“Sure thing, I’ve got your order.”

Despite appearances, they could actually be pretty cute. That was the impression Padfoot Waitress got from Witch, who sat pursing her lips like a little girl.

Or is it because he’s here?

“Say, miss?” said Spearman.

“Yes?”

“Is Guild Girl still here?”

So much for her impressions of them.

Padfoot Waitress found her strength leaving her, but she held herself up, facing Spearman, who wore a serious expression.

She pushed her bangs aside and let out a breath. She was pretty sure Guild Girl was still working. The waitress knew well how late she sometimes stayed.

“…Yeah, it looks like she’s still here.”

“Yesss!”

Witch and Padfoot Waitress watched Spearman without enthusiasm as he made a fist and cheered.

Gosh, and when he has such a gorgeous woman right next to him… was a comment she had better keep to herself.

It was everyone’s own business who they fell in love with.

And yet, to think that “the frontier’s strongest” adventurer, someone whose skill with the spear could have put the Knights of the Capital to shame, would be this way…

He would look cooler if he kept his mouth shut.

She felt a bit uneasy as she considered that perhaps, if you learned everyone’s real reason for becoming an adventurer, it would be just as disillusioning as this.

Well, I suppose he’s easy to make friends with, if nothing else.

That was undoubtedly better than to be too aloof—wasn’t it? With that thought, Padfoot Waitress scuttled off toward the kitchen.

“Grape wine, duck sauté, leg of beef on the bone, well done, apple wine. And two grilled apples!”

“You got it! Take ’em the drinks first!”

“Yessir!”

Rhea Chef called out in a voice that belied his diminutive size. Padfoot Waitress responded with a shout to match.

When she brought the two their drinks, they offered her a smile and a “thank you,” and handed her the money.

“All right then, here’s to our ‘date.’”

“Yes. Bottoms, up.”

As if in harmony with the elegant clink of their glasses, the bell jangled again.

“S-so tired…”

“Come on, walk right! Geez!”

Two young novice adventurers came in, the very picture of fatigue and exhaustion.

Apprentice Priestess all but flung Rookie Warrior into a seat, then wiped the sweat from her forehead.

“Somehow I j-just don’t feel like eating…”

“Well, too bad! You have to eat!”

Suddenly, the girl looked up from scolding the boy, who seemed ready fall asleep at any moment.

Her eyes met those of Padfoot Waitress, and the adventurer girl blushed.

“Oh, s-sorry. Umm…One bowl of oatmeal, please, and bread for two…”

“Yes, ma’am!”

“Oh, and water!”

“On it!”

She headed over to the kitchen and relayed their order. Rhea Chef raised an eyebrow.

“Sure thing! Take it out with the grilled beef. Hrm, now, where’d that vinegar go?”

“I know, I know. Oh, the vinegar is on the shelf behind you.”

As the chef grinned and turned away, Padfoot Waitress pointed to one of the shelves. The chef grabbed a bit of cheese and dropped it onto the plate with the bread, then gave a satisfied nod.

“Okay, I’ll take these over, then!”

“You do that!”

She dropped off the sizzling, oily plate with Spearman and Witch and offered them a word of thanks. Then she pattered over to where the boy and girl sat, but Apprentice Priestess blinked at her.

“Huh? Sorry, we didn’t order this…”

“It’s okay, just eat it.” Padfoot Waitress gave a wave of her hand, pointing at the cheese with one hairy finger. “Anyway, someone will be by soon who can’t get enough of that stuff, and we’ll have to get a new round out. Need to clear out our stock!”

“Th-thank you.”

“Nah. Thank you for helping us with it!”

Having thus made a successful round of her tables, she went to the wall and sighed deeply.

The lively noise of the adventurers in the tavern threatened to turn into a ringing in her ears.

They were enjoying themselves laughing, shouting, and singing, and after eating and drinking, they would resume their merriment.

“Mm.” Padfoot Waitress found it satisfying just to stand there with her arms crossed, watching them.

Then…

“Ohhhh man, am I tired! I want some food and I want to go to bed!”

“There were an awful lot of goblins, weren’t there?”

The bell jingled again, and five more people came in. At the head of the party, throwing the door open with a bang, was a high-elf ranger. A priestess of the Earth Mother followed her.

“Well, a feast is customary after a battle. To drink, eat, make merry, and then sleep—in its own way, this is a remembrance of our enemies.”

“Indeed, but Beard-cutter will be off to hunt more goblins tomorrow, won’t you? Bit of a workaholic…”

Next came a lizardman with a solid, heavy step and a well-built dwarf caster.

And then came the last of them.

“Yes,” the adventurer said bluntly as he came through the door. Everyone in the tavern glanced at him.

Grimy leather armor, a cheap-looking helmet, a small, round shield attached to his arm, and at his hip, a sword of a strange length.

“We need the money,” Goblin Slayer said quietly.

“I’m sorry. If I had just a bit more vitality…”

Then High Elf Archer broke in as if to cover for the disappointed-sounding Priestess.

“Hey, don’t worry about it. Just let some other adventurers handle it.”

“If there are no goblins, we’ll consider it.”

“Sheesh, that’s how it always is with you.” High Elf Archer looked up at the ceiling in exasperation, wagging her ears.

“Hello, welcome!”

Padfoot Waitress trotted up to the entrance, greeting the adventurers with a bright smile.

There were plenty of wild and lawless adventurers, but these folk had a gentleness born of experience—one of them was Silver-ranked.

So it was only natural that she wanted to serve them with a smile.

“Oh-ho,” their intermediary, Lizard Priest, said with a roll of his eyes. “How fares milady waitress? Now, I desire to request some cheese…”

Padfoot Waitress let out a giggle at his somber tone. It was common knowledge that this lizardman had become quite taken with cheese in all its forms.

“What about the rest of you?”

“Hmm, I’ll have—what was it?—the thin stuff. Pasta? I’ll have that,” said High Elf Archer.

“Oh, um, s-something kind of light for me…,” mumbled Priestess.

“’S all this, then?” said Dwarf Shaman. “Am I the only one with a proper appetite? Meat, I say, meat! And a good, strong wine.”

“Something with meat, yes, sir!” Lizard Priest chimed in.

The hem of the waitress’s skirt billowed slightly as she turned to look at the final adventurer.

“Sir, our special today is the pike! Caught in the water town and grilled fresh!”

Just the right ingredients, perfectly done, and of course, the chef’s talents were beyond question. She informed him of all this like a challenge, sticking out her average-sized chest as if to provoke a response.

“So what will it be?”

It was a bit of an impertinent way to talk to a customer, but she did not regard this man as a customer at the moment.

She stared at him, refusing to let him get away, and she thought she could see a red eye within his helmet.

“Nothing,” Goblin Slayer said. “I’m fine for today.”


§

“What’s with him? Is he crazy?!”

“Well, I don’t know about that…”

Padfoot Waitress cut off the workshop apprentice’s response by slamming her fist on the counter.

“I mean, adventurers are supposed to kill dragons and drink wine and laugh like Fwa-ha-ha-ha! That’s their job, isn’t it?”

“I won’t deny there are some like that.” The apprentice accepted the girl’s argument with an ironic smile, then stuck a fork in some fish on a plate. The well-done pike had started to cool a bit, but it was still fatty and delicious. It had lemon or some other seasoning on it, giving it a faint citrus smell that made his mouth water.

“Anyway, thanks for the snack. Mm, that’s good. Been a while since I’ve had fish.”

“I just didn’t want to waste the stuff that went cold. Don’t get the wrong idea!”

“I like how you’re not even saying that to cover your embarrassment or something.”

When had it become part of Padfoot Waitress’s daily routine to bring some food—really leftovers—like this?

It had been late at night, all the adventurers gone to their inns, and she was out of her uniform and cleaning up the tavern.

As she got ready to go home, she’d peeked into the workshop, where the apprentice boy was alone, tending the fire.

“What are you doing?” she had asked him, and he had said, “We can’t let the fire get low.”

Of course, that was just a pretext; with her sharp eyes, she saw that he was making a dagger.

It made sense. He had work during the day, so he had to make time for his own practice.

To Padfoot Waitress, it was an excellent chance; giving him the leftover food seemed the logical thing to do.

“People who can eat, should.”

“I think that’s a contradiction in terms…”

“That’s why it makes me so mad when people ignore my food!” Padfoot Waitress said, showing her anger by flicking her tail vigorously. It wasn’t clear how well the apprentice understood the uniquely padfoot gesture.

“Do you understand that this has to do with my honor as a waitress? Or not? I wonder if you even follow my logic!”

“Well…” The apprentice scratched one cheek with a fingertip in embarrassment. “…I guess I wouldn’t like it if the weapons I made were tossed just any old where.”

“I thought not.”

“That guy just throws swords every which way,” the apprentice grumbled. And the unfortunate blades were not even the work of the apprentice—he didn’t yet have permission to display his work in the store—but of his boss.

“The boss says, ‘You’re the only one who can be truly satisfied with your own work.’”

“Well, I want to get that weirdo to try the food at our tavern.”

“It’s not like he doesn’t eat, is it?”

“That’s just it!” Padfoot Waitress slumped across the workshop’s counter, which was polished to a shine. It pushed against her chest, such as it was, and the apprentice boy averted his eyes as casually as he could. “After his adventures, he usually doesn’t.”

“I—I guess I’ve heard of people who don’t eat before they go…”

“Awww, heck. Maybe he doesn’t like our menu…”

“This is really bothering you all of a sudden.” The apprentice’s eyes crept downward, and he hurriedly raised them again. His cheeks flushed. “What’s the matter?”

“I mean, he never used to come to the tavern, right?” she said, apparently unaware of his slipping gaze. “How long has he been here, anyway?”

“About five years, maybe?”

“I don’t know…”

To Padfoot Waitress, the question of which adventurer had appeared when was trivial. If one paid attention to such things, one would also remember when they disappeared. Once you started worrying about where so-and-so had gone after a while, you were lost. Better to put all your energy into welcoming the people who were here now. She had learned that her first year.

Come to think of it, didn’t the receptionist start to perk up around five years ago?

Padfoot Waitress lay there, her chest on the counter, muttering, “Hmm…”

The apprentice boy tried to keep from looking at her, but somehow kept glancing in her direction. His eyes would travel right, then left, again and again, until before long they had focused on a single point.

“Oh!”

“What?” Padfoot Waitress bounced up, her ears twitching.

“I don’t know if it’s true or not,” the apprentice boy said with a nod, “but I heard once that he likes stew. Beef.”


§

“Beef stew, is it?”

“Right!”

Stationed in front of a large, bubbling pot, Padfoot Waitress stuck out her chest, such as it was. Next to her, the chef stood on a stepladder to peer into the pot, crossing his arms and murmuring, “Hmm.”

“Sorry, Pops. You having to teach me and all.”

“Well, if you learn to cook, I can rest a little easier myself.”

“Aw, stop sounding your age, Pops.”

“I suppose maybe it is my age talking. I’m like butter spread too thin.”

“You mean your spirit?”

“It’s like I’ve been stretched and pulled.” With a “pardon me,” the chef took a spoonful of the stew and tasted it. “Mm, not bad. Let it simmer a little more.”

“All riiight!”

This would be her key to victory.

The chef glanced at Padfoot Waitress as she let out a full-throated “Yay!” and muttered:

“But I wonder how an adventurer will take it…”

“Huh?” She froze instantly. “Was it not good?”

“Ehh, I wouldn’t say that.” Although if he said anything, he might never stop. Rhea Chef scratched his round nose. “Well, give it a think.”

“…Darn it all. You’ll rue the day you gave me time to think!”

“Har har! Keep at it.”

Padfoot Waitress glared at her boss through half-open eyes as he waved his hand at her, then she returned her attention to the stewpot.

Staring intently at it was not the way to figure anything out, and yet…

“Oh, my, I thought I smelled something good in here…”

She heard a familiar voice and two sets of footsteps. The bell on the door hadn’t rung. The newcomers had come from elsewhere in the building.

Padfoot Waitress poked her head out of the kitchen and merrily raised her hand to her two colleagues.

“Hi! I’m just in the middle of cooking. Today’s special—beef stew!”

“Oh, stew, that’s great.”

“Oooh, beef stew!”

They were her colleagues—although strictly speaking, they were officials and she was just an assistant, even though the three of them all worked at the Guild.

But Padfoot Waitress didn’t heed such fine distinctions, nor was she nervous with Guild Girl and Inspector.

“Thanks. Huh? Are you both on lunch?” She could see when she peeked out the window that the sun was past its zenith and beginning to sink in the sky. It wasn’t quite twilight. “It’s pretty late for that.”

“We kind of missed it…”

“That’s no good, how do you expect to keep your body going that way?”

Or did they “miss” it because…?

Surely there was nothing wrong with letting her sharp eyes turn for an instant to one particular place.

“You’re right. I’m famished…” Guild Girl said, holding her stomach. Padfoot Waitress hated that stomach.

We’ve got to fatten her up.

“Okay, so, would you try some of this? We’ll be serving it to the adventurers tonight.”

“Of course, if you don’t mind,” Guild Girl said with a smile and a nod. Then she added, “Oh, but…”

“Hm?” Padfoot Waitress cocked her head.

Guild Girl said awkwardly, “…I wonder what adventurers will think of it.”

“Yeah… It looks kind of bloody,” Inspector said with a nod.

“Oh…”

Now that they mentioned it, she could see what they meant. The stock, which included tomatoes, was a reddish-black; chunks of meat bubbled up in the stew.

As Padfoot Waitress stood there muttering to herself, she felt a tiny hand smack her on the behind.

“Yeek!”

“’Scuse me, ladies, please don’t interfere with my lessons.”

It was, needless to say, the chef. The middle-aged man who had popped in from beside them gave his rotund belly an angry thump, and put on a stern expression. “I was hoping to see whether this girl would notice for herself.”

“Oh, my, pardon us.”

Guild Girl let slip a small giggle and, indicating the stew, said, “We’ll have lunch here, then. To apologize.”

“So you shall—eat plenty! Is just stew enough?”

“Oh, all right. Let’s see, then. Bread and… Could I get some black tea?”

“And plenty of jam to go with it!”

“My pleasure!”

Guild Girl and Inspector made their orders; Rhea Chef gave them a spirited answer and tightened his apron strings.

“Well now, don’t just stand there—to work, to work!”

“Ergggg—yessir!”

There was no helping anything now. The food was done, and whoever wanted to eat it would eat it.

Padfoot Waitress rushed around on her tasks, and in due course night came.

When the sun was well and truly set, adventurers poured into the tavern just as usual.

Unsurprisingly, the beef stew seemed unexpected, and takers were few.

Did they not want it right after an adventure? And yet serving beef stew first thing in the morning seemed…

“…Actually, maybe it would work to put it on the breakfast menu.”

She occupied herself with these optimistic thoughts until finally one adventurer came walking with a bold stride.

For a second, every eye in the tavern turned to him, and conversation stopped, but the chatter was quickly revived.

The grimy leather armor, the cheap-looking steel helmet, the small, round shield on his arm, and the sword of a strange length at his hip.

He walked through the Guild building, heading outside. He did not even look in the direction of the tavern.

As if I would let you get away!

Padfoot Waitress rushed to stand in front of him and fixed him with a finger.

“Sir, today’s special is beef stew!”

“Is it?”

“What would you like to order?!”

“Nothing,” Goblin Slayer said. “I’m fine for today.”


§

“I thought you said he liked beef stew!”

“I said it was just something I’d heard.”

It was midnight.

In the scant light of the lamp, Apprentice Boy seemed quite pleased with the tureen of beef stew she had brought him.

This did not exactly offend Padfoot Waitress, but she pursed her lips and glared at him just the same.

“Ooh, potato chunks. Perfect.”

“…Are you sure you didn’t say it just because you wanted some beef stew?”

“No way. Well, maybe just a little.” Apprentice Boy grinned at her.

The well-boiled meat was so soft you could have cut it with a spoon. But it wasn’t limp; it still felt just right to bite into. And the juices spurting out each time it was chewed, the oil and soup base, were delicious even if they were a little cold.

As for the vegetables—he did like them chunky and heavy.

“So, what are you doing?”

“I’m collecting the filings from when we did the sharpening.”

Padfoot Waitress watched him with genuine interest, and he answered as he gave her back the tureen.

He swept at a corner of the smithy shop with a broom, all the while thinking it didn’t become him.

“You get plenty, even from knives.” He didn’t point out that some people considered swords to be nothing more than oversized knives.

Sharpening was accomplished by grinding the metal against a whetstone the shape of a cart wheel, so the process produced plenty of metal shavings. Making sure these were properly cleaned up was one of an apprentice’s various important jobs.

Besides, there was also the fact that mixing them with certain metals would make their material last longer. At times, they also used the shavings when a rush job called for more supplies than they had.

What I really want is to hurry up and do some smithing, though…

As an apprentice, he was still learning. Obviously, no one would trust him with the all-important production of weapons and armor.

So, he believed, he would simply have to devote his utmost to what he was given to do.

It’s not as if I don’t get it—that feeling of seeing your efforts completely ignored.

What if he displayed weapons he had made—in the future, of course—and they were summarily ignored?

“You want to at least know why, don’t you?” he asked.

“Yeah, exactly! I can’t accept it this way—acceptance is so important!”

“Hmmm,” the apprentice muttered, his arms crossed. Then he suddenly uncrossed them and clapped his hands, exclaiming, “Hey, that’s it!”

“What is it? Had an idea, O future master smith? Fill me in!”

As Padfoot Waitress leaned in toward him, a fragrance of some kind drifted from her hair. It was the smell of the kitchen’s cooking, the grassy scent that was unique to Padfoot’s, soap—and something else, something sweet. Apprentice Boy swallowed heavily and waved his hands.

“J-just ask! Ask someone who knows better.”

“What, you mean like Pops in the kitchen?”

“No,” he said. “I mean that farm girl.”


§

“What’s that? Stew?”

“Uh-huh!”

It was late morning, at the delivery entrance behind the Guild.

Cow Girl had unloaded the cargo with a “Hhup!” and now she blinked at Padfoot Waitress.

Her generous bosom bounced as she let out a breath and wiped the sweat from her forehead.

Padfoot Waitress was well aware that she herself was about average—actually, maybe a little more than average; certainly not less. But still…

Maybe they’re full of milk?

She couldn’t keep the sordid thought from crossing her mind.

According to the office gossip, Guild Girl worked nonstop to maintain her figure—in that respect, Padfoot Waitress was still okay.

“I’m sure you’re a better cook than I am.” Cow Girl flushed and laced her fingers together in front of her chest awkwardly. “I only know how to do stuff you can make at home…”

“It’s not about whether or not you’re good at cooking.” Padfoot Waitress seated herself on a barrel with a catlike lightness. She ran her pen along the receipt she held in a clipboard in her hand. Money matters were the work of the reception staff, but vetting the order was her job.

“I know I ask this every time, but are you sure you don’t want to look inside?”

“My nose knows. It’s all right.”

Padfoot Waitress gave a proud little chuckle and stuck out her chest that pressed against her apron. Knowing, of course, that she could never win that contest, she quickly waved her hand to change the subject:

“Like I said. It’s not about whether you can cook. There’s this guy who doesn’t eat, and I’ve really been stewing about it.”

“There’s an adventurer who doesn’t eat?”

“Is something wrong?”

“No…” Cow Girl gave a troubled smile and scratched her cheek. “…He doesn’t mean any harm.”

“That’s the whole problem!”

“Hmm…” Cow Girl sounded a bit lost at Padfoot Waitress’s insistence. She wiped away beading sweat with her arm, then took a seat herself on a nearby box.

She let her legs dangle, carefree, then fixed Padfoot Waitress with a stare.

“Is that all?”

To a human or the like, her tone would have sounded no different from normal. But not so for Padfoot Waitress. Her sharp ears detected the ever-so-slight tremble in Cow Girl’s voice.

“Is what all?” She cocked her head, pretending not to notice anything.

“Well, um, you know.” Cow Girl couldn’t quite get the words out, her eyes darting this way and that. She took a deep breath. “…Do you want to give it to someone you like or something?”

“Ohhh, no, nothing like that.”

Padfoot Waitress gave a hearty laugh and waved her hand like she had just heard a silly joke.

“I don’t have anyone to cook for besides the customers…”

Her hand stopped moving.

Well, maybe one person.

Before she knew it, her face fell, and she covered it with one padded hand.

There was one person to whom she always gave the food she made.

“…I guess I might give some to that guy at the workshop.”

“…”

Cow Girl looked hard at Padfoot Waitress’s face. Her frank, light red eyes seemed to pin the padfoot girl in place.

“Wh-what is it…?” Padfoot Waitress asked, but for a moment, Cow Girl didn’t say anything.





“…Well, okay, then,” she said indifferently after a time, and Padfoot Waitress found herself letting out a breath. “I’ll tell you. You have something to write with?”

“Right here,” Padfoot Waitress said, turning over the paperwork. She grabbed her pen and said, “Go ahead.” Cow Girl gave a helpless smile.

“Umm, all right. The way you make it is…”

And then she explained the recipe in detail.

Stew, really, was a boiled meat dish, not a soup. But the food she described used plenty of milk. And in a word, the impression it made was…

“Surprisingly…normal?”

“Right,” Cow Girl nodded with a smile. “It’s totally normal.”

“I mean, it’s just a regular stew, isn’t it?”

“That’s right,” she said, never letting her smile slip. “Just a regular stew.”

It was unexpected, to say the least.

The waitress had been sure there was something more…unique to the recipe. She rubbed her temple with the end of her pen.

“Is it some kind of heirloom recipe, passed down in your family for generations?”

“Ha-ha-ha. I guess so, kind of.” Cow Girl smiled lightly and jumped down from the box. She smacked her hands to get the dust off, then gave a big stretch, pushing out her ample chest. “Not that I learned it from my mother… Although I wish I had.”

Padfoot Waitress tilted her head at the faint murmur.

“Your relatives, then?”

“A neighbor.” Cow Girl looked up at the blue sky and narrowed her eyes. The wind ran through her red hair. “The older girl who lived next door.”


§

“Hello, welcome!”

“Heyo. Get us three ales and two lemon waters—for starters!”

“Certainly!”

“And, uh…eh, the steamed potato platter will do. For five!”

“Coming right up!”

The tavern at twilight. Padfoot Waitress wove her way through the back-and-forth conversations of adventurers.

It was the same liveliness as ever. The same faces. It was wonderful.

Another day on which they could return home to delicious food and drink. That alone was enough to motivate everyone.

“Order coming, Pops!”

“Sure thing. Try not to let ’em get cold—or drop ’em!”

Such was the favorite rejoinder of Rhea Chef.

She peeked in the kitchen, where soup was boiling noisily, a frying pan was sizzling, and a knife flashed among ingredients.

And of course, the chef was in the middle of it all, his short arms moving ceaselessly.

He does a lot with that little body.

She never got tired of watching him, even though she saw him every day.

When the plates came out, Padfoot Waitress stacked them on both arms, glancing toward the stockpot deeper in the kitchen as she did so.

“Is that okay? It hasn’t boiled over?”

“What, are you telling me how to cook? This from the culinary equivalent of a five-year-old!”

“I know, I know. I was just checking.”

Feeling a lecture coming on, she straightened her tail and skirt and trotted away.

This was always Padfoot Waitress’s favorite time at the tavern.

She could welcome adventurers as they came home, see their relief at getting back.

There were those adventurers who couldn’t come home, too. She had faith that they were off traveling somewhere.

What happened to an adventurer, and where, was something only the bravest could say…

“…Mmm?”

Padfoot Waitress’s ears suddenly twitched. They had picked up bold, almost violent, nonchalant footsteps coming closer.

The grimy leather armor, the cheap-looking steel helmet, the small, round shield on his arm, and the sword of a strange length at his hip.

And at Goblin Slayer’s appearance, of course, the tavern fell silent for an instant.

“Sir?!”

“…Reception told me to be sure to stop by the tavern.” The steel helmet tilted a little at the sound of surprise that escaped her. “What is it? Have goblins shown up here?”

“Oh, no! Sir, please wait there a moment.”

“All right.”

Leaving the strange, but nodding, man where he was, Padfoot Waitress hurried off to the kitchen.

“Oh— Oh-ho! What’s this, now?”

“Get me a dish, Pops! Just a small one!”

“Tell it to the person who washed them!”

“That was me!”

She snatched a dish from the shelf of tableware as they squawked at each other. She spooned some stew into it, then rushed back into the tavern so she could serve it while it was still hot.

“A taster!”

“…” Goblin Slayer looked doubtfully at the dish Padfoot Waitress slid in front of him. “Stew?”

“That’s right!”

“For me to taste?”

“That’s right!”

“…I see.”

He took the dish reluctantly, but then expertly gulped it down through his visor.

So much for Padfoot Waitress’s expectation that he might take his helmet off while he ate. But…

Goblin Slayer let out a faintly surprised “Mm.”

The waitress’s ears were not as good as an elf’s, but they didn’t miss that.

She’d done it. A less than gracious smile came over her face as she asked triumphantly, “What do you think? Pretty good, huh?”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer nodded. “Not bad.”

“Yeeeesss!!”

She found herself pumping her fist in the air and giving a cheer of victory. She didn’t even mind the other adventurers who looked over, trying to figure out what was going on.

“Yes! Awesome! I did it!” She spun around, the hem of her skirt billowing, then said happily, “So you eating tonight, right, sir? What’s your order? Stew?”

“Nothing,” Goblin Slayer said. “I’m fine for today.”

“What?! Why?!”

Padfoot Waitress was so taken aback that she nearly dropped the dish, scrambling to keep ahold of it. Goblin Slayer said, “Someone is waiting for me.”

His voice was curt, dispassionate and cold, almost mechanical.

But Padfoot Waitress blinked at the words. She stared intently at the helmet.

In her mind, the red eye gazing back from inside it overlapped with another, lighter red eye.

Oh…

So that’s how it was.

“What’s wrong?” Goblin Slayer had tilted his head questioningly at Padfoot Waitress, who had suddenly smiled.

She could see it now. Looking at it like this, it was unmistakable.

“Nothing. I was just thinking, sir, you don’t mean any harm.”

“Is that so?” Goblin Slayer nodded firmly and then said, “Are you done?”

“I guess so,” Padfoot Waitress said, to which he predictably replied, “Is that so?” and turned away. “In that case, I will go.”

“Sure, good to have you, our treat.”

“I don’t understand what you mean.”

Goblin Slayer shook his head and walked through the tavern with a bold but quick stride.

“Hey, Goblin Slayer! Kill some more goblins?”

“How about you fight something else for once? You’ve gotta hunt big game like me!”

“Aww, by yourself today? No cute little priestess or sexy elf?”

Replying “Yes” or “Is that so?” and the like to the teasing voices around him, Goblin Slayer opened the door.

And then, leaving only the jangle of the bell behind him, he went out into the town, into the night.

Well, that wasn’t exactly accurate.

His adventure over, he was going back. To his home.

“Sheesh. If that was what he was up to, he could have just said something!”

Padfoot Waitress laughed, realizing how one-sided her competition had been.

Then she let out an “All right!” and gave her cheeks a good smack with her padded hands.

The cheer refreshed her, and she retied the apron strings at her back, ready to work.

“Today’s special is stew I poured my heart and soul into! Any takers?”

Hands went up. People called out. As each order came in, Padfoot Waitress smiled and wrote them down, calling out, “Sure thing!”

But she had chosen an awfully large stockpot to make her stew. There was no maybe about it: there were sure to be leftovers.

And in that case…

“I can just make him eat them!”

If she could make food she liked, how she liked, and feed it to a person she liked, that was enough.

Padfoot Waitress hurried out into the furor of the tavern.





For this goblin, everything was just the worst, the worst, the worst.

They were deep in a claustrophobic little hole that could not be called comfortable by any stretch of the imagination. And he had been posted in front of a door that reeked with a raw stench.

“No! D-don’t, stoppit— St-stoooagh!”

He peeked in through the crack left by the ill-fitting wooden door to find his companion smack in the middle of his business. He had no desire to see another goblin’s dirty little behind, but the behind of the female who was presently being held down, kicking at the sky—that he did want to see.

“…? GROB! GBROOB!”

But the other goblin noticed him watching and screeched at him, whereupon he quickly turned back around.

This was how it always was. You’re the sentry, so stand guard, they would say, and he would be left to wait for his turn. They could at least let him watch.

Those were the thoughts that ran through his head as he scrutinized the spear he was holding. It had a metal tip and an oak wood shaft, but the shaft had been viciously snapped halfway down.

It was the goblin who had broken it. He had felt it was too long and too heavy to use, and if he broke it, then he would have two spears.

The weapon had been practically shiny when he got it, but now point and shaft were covered in a crimson grime.

He had been happy when he had received the job of sentry along with the spear they had taken from this woman, but…

“GBBORB…”

He didn’t have the slightest idea how he was supposed to get this stain off. Now that he thought about it, maybe the nice, neat belt that other goblin had gotten would have been better. That goblin had such a fine belt yet had the gall to steal glances at this spear.

He could barely stand it. That belt suited him more than that other goblin! Yeah. No belt would fit that lout.

He’s part of my family, so if he died, I could have it.

In a horde, almost everyone was related by blood, but that didn’t cross his mind. His shortsighted little brain begin fuming at the thought of something he couldn’t have.

“E-eeeeyaaaaaghh!”

Like the female.

Each time he saw the others enjoying themselves, doing as they pleased with her, jealousy burned in his heart.

He had been left in the nest on the justification that he was the sentry, and he had never gotten to have one of their catches to himself. He had been part of a group on several occasions, but had never sampled the unique pleasure of being alone.

The woman in that room was typical: struggling and fighting and refusing to give up, no matter how long it went on. Of course, the goblins were doing what they typically did in the face of such a show of contempt—hurt her, break her.

There was one who seemed to have given up, curling into a little ball and waiting for the storm to pass. But then she had died as they had fun trying to find out just what it would take to make her scream.

There were others who apologized profusely to the goblins, kowtowing and scraping their heads against the ground and thrusting their behinds out.

And once, because goblins would do anything, they had cut off someone’s arms and legs one by one, boiled, and eaten them.

Now, that was tasty.

He couldn’t quite remember when or where that had been, but he licked his chops.

That was, ultimately, the relationship between goblins and other races. If the latter were strong, the former had no choice but to cringe and obey them. But if a creature was dying before them—be it an ogre or a demon—they would be upon it en masse and devour it in every sense of the word. That was how goblins were.

“GOBRBOB…”

“GBORB?!”

His companion, having finished his business, opened the door and came out. Maybe it had given him some nerve, because on the way by he gave a mocking snigger.

This companion thought “guard duty” just meant walking around the nest, and here he was laughing at the sentry. It made the sentry so angry that he gave the other goblin a jab in the butt with the shaft of his spear.

“GOBORB?!”

The sentry guffawed as the other goblin jumped into the air. His victim came at him with fists raised, so he turned the spear around and offered the point.

“GROB! GBOOROBO!!”

In other words, this was his post, so if the other goblin had no more business there, he should be on his way.

The other goblin had no comeback to the authority of a job assigned. As he walked away grumbling, the sentry spat out, Serves you right, and smirked.

Now for the fun part.

The sentry glanced left and right, making sure no one could see him, then snuck in through the rotting door.

“GBOB…?”

The female stared upward, offering only a weak “ahh” or “ugh” even when he kicked her. You could barely tell whether she was alive or not. The goblin gave her a gentle jab with his spear, and she immediately cried out, “Gaaah!” He followed up a couple of times more, and she produced some interesting “yaaargh” type sounds.

Bah. Without perks like this, it would be impossible to put up with the difficult sentry work. It was annoying, though, that they warned him not to let her die.

They would be angry with him if she were to die when they still wanted more fun with her. But a little anger in exchange for someone like this? It would be worth the trouble.

“Give it… Give it back…!”

“GRRORB!”

The goblin cocked his head at the woman, who had finally begun to sniffle and sob.

Hmm, this spear did belong to this female, didn’t it?

The spear, like the woman, would not last very long. He found the thought oddly funny and let slip a chuckle.

He had his fun with the female until she could no longer make a sound, and then he wandered out into the nest.

He had made sure she was still alive—still twitching, at least—and even taken care of toilet duty.

And it would soon be “morning.” Adventurers only came at “night.”

No one can get on my case for anything.

Goblins always take things in the way that looks best for them.

“GOROB! GOOBORROB!!”

“GBBROBOG!!”

He had been walking around the nest for a while when he heard high-spirited cackling.

It was the scouts.

Two or three of them were sitting together, drinking wine from a chipped bowl.

They were the ones who searched the roads or the village outskirts for unwitting prey, venturing out in ones or twos. So it was only natural that they got plenty of fringe benefits.

It was not uncommon for them to fall back early to a place the goblins believed was safe, to enjoy themselves. They were always gleefully pocketing the items they had stolen from whoever they’d found. But their job was easy, ganging up to attack their prey. The sentry worked so hard all the time, and these guys…!

What about guard work?! he thought, indignant at being ignored. He tried to show them the blunt end of his spear, but they only glared at him.

“GOBOR…?”

“GOROBOR!”

They hadn’t done anything to him, and all the spear-waving in the world wouldn’t change that. He dodged the scout who made to give him a blow with the bowl, slunk away.

Pfah. They were disgustingly violent creatures. They should just go ahead and die.

Still wracked with bitterness, he arrived at the side path that extended from near the entrance. It was an ambush route the goblins had dug, familiar as they were with earth and soil. Adventurers, or whatever they called themselves, never seemed to think they might be attacked from behind.

There were, of course, rocks nearby to hide behind, and it was one of those that the sentry now approached.

All of it, everyone.

He hated, hated, hated everything.

He hated sentry work.

He hated that he got nothing but a spear.

He hated the scouts for intimidating him.

He even hated their half-witted chief, who had nothing but his size to recommend him. He himself would make a better chief than that idiot!

He could have all the adventurers and village females he wanted, all to himself.

He could make the guards and the scouts do all the unpleasant, annoying things. He would just bellow orders deep in the hole and gorge himself on food and females.

Hrm. Chief sounded like a pretty good job.

He became completely absorbed in what to him seemed a realistic possibility, when objectively it was pure fantasy.

How would he assassinate the chief who had united the horde? How would the lowly triumph over the high?

He conceived a plan that he had no doubt would succeed. Then he slowly raised himself from the shadow of his rock.

But…

“GORB…?”

Suddenly his none-too-sharp ears picked up the sound of bold footsteps.

They were quickly approaching. He hurriedly concealed himself behind the rock, then carefully peeked out, just his eyes showing.

An adventurer!

There was no mistake. Only an adventurer would walk through their nest with a torch in hand.

And all alone, no less. The smell was hard to figure out. He hoped it was a female. But even if it was a male, they could still eat it.

The goblin licked his chops, slavering horribly, not bothering to hide the greed welling up in him.

He would attack, drag the adventurer down, tear at it, have his way with it. Damned adventurer. Damned adventurer!

But as he hid, ready to leap out with his spear in hand, a modicum of judgment remained to him.

His prey was alone. But even so, goblins were weak. Adventurers were stupid, but they were strong. Even if the goblin ambushed the adventurer here and now, it would mean nothing if he himself were killed.

He could call out to summon his companions, but he would still be the first to die.

He could sneak back quietly to tell them, but there were scouts along the way. They would get all the credit.

What to do?

The goblin stood there, spear in hand, thinking as hard as he could.

He didn’t want to die. He wanted to get something out of this. What to do, what to do?

Maybe I should run.

He quickly shook his head. No, that wouldn’t work. If the adventurer found he had run, it would beat him to a pulp. And if his companions won the day, the one who had fled would get nothing. Not mating, not food. He would only be able to watch as everyone else enjoyed themselves in front of him.

He couldn’t stand that. So he decided to wait for his moment.

He held his breath, careful not to make a sound, as he trailed the adventurer slowly, oh so slowly.





Finally, his moment came.

“GOROBOR!!”

“GROB! GROBORB!!”

The adventurer arrived where the scouts were having their wine.

The instant he did, he pitched the torch in his left hand directly into the middle of the party.

“GORB?!”

“GRBBBROG?! GROBOOBR!”

Wine splattered, and fire spread. Feeding on the alcohol, the torch flame reached a white heat.

Goblins were certainly capable of seeing in the dark, but their vision was still hampered by smoke.

One screamed, one panicked, and one simply did not know what was going on. Each of the three scouts had a different reaction, but all of them were still trying to grasp the situation when the adventurer acted.

“GROB?!”

A body blow with a small shield.

The target, who had unfortunately had his back turned, stumbled face-first into the fire.

“Four,” the adventurer muttered, stepping squarely on top of the goblin as he writhed with the agony of the burns.

“GRBBBR…”

“GROBROB!!”

The remaining two caught their breath. Even so, they picked up weapons to strike the rampaging invader.

But they were too late.

The adventurer’s right hand flashed as he flung his sword; it crushed the teeth of one scout as it pierced him through the mouth.

“GOOBR?!”

“Five.”

The adventurer did not even look at the kneeling, twitching goblin with brains dribbling out the back of his head.

Instead, the adventurer shifted his weight onto the goblin under his foot, breaking its spine and lunging forward as his left arm approached the final scout.

“GBBOORB?!”

The sharpened edge of the shield gouged the goblin’s face. A spray of blood painted the wall.

The goblin threw aside his weapon to press his hands to his shattered nose and eye socket, but…

“That’s six.”

The adventurer picked up the scout’s hand spear, which had tumbled to his feet, and pierced the creature’s heart with it.

The last scout soon ceased to do anything but twitch and was nothing more than a bag of blood dribbling innards onto the ground.

The adventurer tossed the spear aside as if it were so much garbage and exhaled.

Then he nonchalantly approached the body, stepped on it, and grasped the sword protruding from its throat.

They were fools.

If this goblin had not been waiting behind, watching for his chance, he would never have known, either.

Three against one. True, the scouts had been drunk. But he could see what happened.

That was why his way was better.

The scout hacked blood, giving a death rattle. In his heart, the sentry was overjoyed at the sight.

That’ll show you, you barbaric dolts.

There was no hint of compassion in him for the scouts who had been turned into such avatars of suffering.

But be that as it may, he was angry at the one who would come into his very nest and murder goblins.

That was why this was the moment, when the adventurer, tired from battle, had its back turned.

Now!

His companions would soon arrive, drawn by the commotion. When they saw him holding the adventurer down after attacking it from behind, they would praise him. He might even be able to boast of having stood and fought while his companions were killed.

With his heart full of self-interest and greed, he took a giant leap. He brought his spear down, holding it in a reverse grip.

The belly or chest would do, if that was the best he could get, but the arm or the leg was ideal. If it turned out to be a man, all they could do was eat it.

“—?!”

That was when it happened.

He didn’t know what had occurred. All he knew was that his attack was supposed to have been an ambush from behind, but the adventurer was gripping his spear with both hands.

The armored adventurer moved too quickly to see.

And in the instant the goblin was trying to decide whether to let go of the spear or do something else, he found himself rammed, spear and all, into the ground.

“GROB?!”

He hadn’t considered this possibility.

His mind went blank; he was at a complete loss what to do.

“GBBOROBO?!”

He could not make a proper response in the midst of his confusion.

He felt a terrific pain from the blow to his back, his flesh and bones cried out, and most of all, he found it hard to breathe.

He opened and closed his mouth, and the spear fell from his hand.

There was nothing else left to him. The adventurer had drawn a sword.

The goblin stood with a wobble and began running for the entrance of the cave as fast as he could—

“This will make seven.”

Along with the ruthless pronouncement came a shock that ran from his back to his chest, and his consciousness slipped away.

It never came back.


§

“Hrm.”

After finishing off seven goblins, Goblin Slayer finally got to take a breath.

You can notice a tail when an extra set of footsteps comes pattering after you.

He drew out his blade and wiped off the blood on the goblin’s rags, then checked the edge and returned the sword to its scabbard. It could still be used.

He traced the point of the spear he had taken from the goblin with his fingertip and examined the broken shaft.

Goblin Slayer clicked his tongue, then added it to his belt.

Then he kicked the scouts’ hands, breaking their fingers and freeing the swords that the corpses still grasped.

There happened to be three of them. He took the one in the best condition and added it to his belt. This would do.

He scrabbled through his item pouch, grabbing his canteen and pulling out the stopper, then gulping down the contents.

The canteen was made from a sheep’s stomach, turned inside out and dried, and it contained a mixture of well water and grape wine.

The cold liquid slid through the visor of Goblin Slayer’s helmet, then between his lips, flowing down his throat and into his stomach.

It would do no good to become drunk on wine, but a little bit warmed the body and helped alertness.

“…Didn’t see any totems,” Goblin Slayer muttered to himself as he plugged the stopper and returned the canteen to his item pouch.

He shook his head gently when he realized there was no answer.

Priestess and his other companions—he shook his head again to realize he thought of them that way—were not there.

They had their plans. They had their health to worry about. They could not always be all together.

Goblin Slayer turned his back to the wall and pushed his visor down. He quieted his breath. He didn’t hear anything like footsteps.

Instead, he heard the snarfing sound of a meal being devoured. He could feel little shock waves in his back. It was clear what was going on.

His light source—the torch—still twinkled among the remains of the scouts’ revelries. Good.

Goblin Slayer quickly withdrew a bottle from his item pack and flung it in roughly the right place.

The clay container and the wall both exploded at about the same instant.

“GBRROBORRBBBG!!”

Goblins.

A horde of them, a roiling tide.

But the first several who jumped eagerly forward unexpectedly tumbled over.

They must have tripped on the grease all over the floor. The somersaults were just a bit of added humiliation.

“GOROB?!”

“GOB?! GBOROOBOGOBG?!”

They screamed, finding themselves kicked and trodden by their compatriots, who came one after another from behind them.

Worse, they had fallen into the burning torch and were enveloped in roaring flames.

“GOROOOBOGOROOBO?!?!”

“Eight, nine…ten.”

The burning creatures accounted for two of these. The other was one who had been trampled until he fell still.

“Seven left. One spear, one sword, one ax, four clubs. Good.”

Heedless of the immolation of their nestmates, the other goblins surged forth, anger and greed shining in their eyes.

Having taken stock of his enemies, Goblin Slayer readied his sword and met them head on.

“GBBRBGGB!!”

The first to come at him was the goblin holding a spear—the literal spearhead of the operation.

“Eleven.”

Goblin Slayer nonchalantly threw his sword at the creature. It whooshed through the cavern’s stagnant air and buried itself in the goblin’s forehead with a thwack, piercing his brain.

“GGBGGO?!”

As the goblin stumbled and fell under the impact, Goblin Slayer snatched the weapon from his hand.

A longer weapon was not bad. You wouldn’t be surrounded. The first thing was to take out whoever had the most firepower.

Had a big one been present, the priority would have been to reduce their numbers, but at the moment he wanted to avoid being rendered immobile on account of a single blow.

That meant his next step was clear.

Goblin Slayer, still gripping the spear, dashed for the depths of the cave.

“GOROOB! GOROOBORG!!”

“GROOB!!”

The goblins, six of them, followed him with pathetic-sounding footsteps. Goblin Slayer glanced back to fix his aim, then hefted his spear.

“This is twelve.”

The spear flew, drawing a bow-shaped arc.

It passed over the goblin who had been shoved to the front and slammed into the one holding an ax.

“GOOROBOG?!”

Perhaps it had been pierced through the stomach; an inarticulate scream echoed around the cave.

Five left. Goblin Slayer threw the scout’s sword from his belt. He was running out of time, and it was risky to go in deeper. It was time to engage the enemy.

“GOROBB!!”

“GBOR!”

The goblin with the sword self-importantly dispensed orders to the four with clubs.

Of course, this was no show of courage, nor was it a burning desire for revenge.

They were displeased at having seen their companions killed, and they wanted to pound this triumphant adversary. Most of all, the goblins enjoyed beating down adventurers and stealing their gear more than anything else.

“Hmph.”

Goblin Slayer took a step backward, then stomped down the first club that swung at him.

“GBOROB?!”

While that monster was trying to free his weapon, Goblin Slayer thrust his sword at the one that leaped at him from the right.

The blade slid in through the creature’s jaw, piercing the head at an angle. But it could not bear the weight of the goblin and broke.

“GOOROBOOBO?!”

“Four more.”

As he adjusted his grip on the hilt of the sword, he met a club blow from the monster in front with his shield. His left arm tingled. In the same motion, he made a sweeping gesture with the shield and slammed the opponent into the goblin on the left.

“GBOR?!”

“GOROBO?!”

“Next.”

While the two goblins were still writhing with the impact, he brandished the hilt of the sword at a creature in front of him. The panicked goblin dropped his club and tried to run, but it was too late.

“GOBOOROGOBOGOB?!”

One blow. The hilt and guard of the sword sank into the back of the goblin’s head, caving in its skull, and the monster screamed.

It wasn’t a critical wound, but that didn’t matter. He could simply beat the life out of the goblin.

Goblin Slayer pounded the creature with his bladeless sword as if it were a hammer.

“GOROB?! GOROOG?! GOOROBOG?!”

Dull thumps and thwacks rang out until finally blood and brains sprayed from the shattered skull.

Goblin Slayer gave a click of his tongue and let go of the sword, then moved his feet to pick up the club he’d been standing on.

“That makes ten and four. Three left…!”

The two other goblins had scrambled to their feet and were coming at him together.

Goblin Slayer dealt with one of them using his round shield, cracking the monster’s head beyond the reach of the other one’s club.

“Two left.”

The difference in body size meant a certain difference in reach. And in a one-on-one fight, there was no way he could lose to a goblin.

A moment later, the death rattle of the next creature echoed in the cave.

“GOROOBOROB?!”

“GOROBOGR!!”

The last remaining goblin, the one with the sword, lost no time in giving a great cry and running away.

Luckily for the goblin, his enemy was heading deeper into the cave. If he ran for the outside, he would probably not be followed. The hateful brightness out there looked to him like salvation.

The goblin felt no guilt at abandoning his companions. It was their fault he was in danger to begin with.

He trod over the still-smoldering remains of the other creatures, running, running, running…

“Hrmph.”

Goblin Slayer nonchalantly let go of the brain-soaked club, approaching the corpse that was impaled with a spear.

The ax was still in its hand. He picked it up with a flourish and flung it.

The fleeing goblin died believing to the last instant that he alone would be saved.

The ax tore through his skull from behind, decimating his brain. He pitched forward and fell.

“Seventeen.”

Goblin Slayer took a new torch from his item pouch, lighting it from the embers of the one that lay among the remains of the party.

Then he turned back for a moment, even bolder than before, and searched the corpse of the goblin he had killed with the ax.

He was looking for the sword. When he found it, he put it into his scabbard.

“Three on reconnaissance, one chance encounter, three scouts, ten by ambush. Seventeen total. There are prisoners. No totems. No poison,” he muttered to himself

How to interpret this? Of course, he heard no answer. Goblin Slayer started to think.

The nest was on a small scale. There probably weren’t too many more goblins. And he hadn’t taken their leader yet.

“Perhaps a hob is their chieftain.”

And yet, he had no sense that a hobgoblin was coming.

Goblin Slayer soon determined what this would mean.

“It’s the sort of thing a goblin would think of.”

He quickly took stock of all his equipment. Helmet, armor, shield, weapon, all good.

He held the torch in his left hand and walked into the cave with his bold, nonchalant stride.

The nest was large enough to house ten creatures or so. It had some branches, but there was a limit to them.

But more than anything, it was the unpleasant odor prickling in his nose that told Goblin Slayer where to go.

He made several turns in the winding path and soon arrived at a rotting door.

“Ah—ouch! That— That hurts—?!”

“GGGOROOOBB!!”

What emerged was a massive goblin pulling a woman by the hair.

The woman gave a cry of pain, but judging from the state of her body, she was in no condition to resist anymore.

Several strands of hair came loose, taking bits of her scalp with them, but it was all she could do to raise a cry.

As it taunted her, the hobgoblin realized there was someone blocking his way. He looked up.

“GOROBB……”

The hobgoblin grumbled something, hauled the woman up, and held her in front of him.

An awful stench wafted from every part of her; blood and waste mingled together and dribbled down her body.

The hob pushed her in front of himself as if to catch Goblin Slayer’s attention with her glassy eyes—presumably he saw her as a meat shield.

“Fool,” Goblin Slayer spat. “It won’t change anything.”

The hob’s thinking was clear. Actually, any goblin would probably have thought the same in that situation.

As long as he survived, that was all that mattered.

The creature had meant to sacrifice his nestmates and escape with the female.

It was just the sort of thing a goblin would think of.

“GROBO! GOBOOROGB!!”

“…”

He assumed it was telling him to drop his weapon, or let it by, or something similar.

The hobgoblin grinned horribly at him, brandishing the hatchet in its right hand.

Goblin Slayer looked at the woman that the creature was using as a shield. He gazed into her eyes. And then he gave a single, small nod.

“Very well.”

He drew the sword at his hip and dropped it. The hob’s eyes followed the motion.

Goblin Slayer leaped forward instantly, kicking the creature mercilessly in the crotch.

“GGROOOOROOBOROOB?!?!”

The monster gave an unbearable scream at the damage between its legs. Goblin Slayer had, indeed, felt something burst under his toes.

Goblins were always so cocksure. Even though he had never had the slightest intention of quietly letting himself be killed.

“Erg—ahh!”

“GBBRGO?! GOROOBOGOROGOB?!?!”

The hobgoblin threw the woman aside in his convulsions. The steel helmet looked down at him impassively.

Then Goblin Slayer picked up his sword, held it in a reverse grip, braced himself against the goblin’s shoulder, and drove the blade home.

“GOOBOR?!”

There was just one incoherent bellow. The sword stood upright in the back of the creature’s skull. Goblin Slayer gave it a great twist.

The sword cut the spine with a crack, and the hob gave one tremendous shake and then stopped moving.

“Eighteen… Are you alive?”

The discarded woman trembled. Faintly, lips trembling, she breathed an “eh” and “ss.”

“I see.”

Goblin Slayer rifled through his item pouch, pulling out a bundled up overcoat. He spread it over the woman, and once it was covering her scum-drenched body, he hefted her like cargo.

The woman murmured something weakly, to which Goblin Slayer said, “I see,” and nodded.

“I picked up the spear,” he said. “The shaft is broken, but the point remains.”

Goblin Slayer walked quietly out of the cave.

A weak, desperate weeping weighed heavily on his back.
